     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Air Defenses

        Libyan air defenses use Russian-built equipment. Russian advisors
     train native Libyan crews, who then operate the equipment. SA-2
     Guideline and SA-5 Gammon SAMs have been the backbone of Libyan air
     defenses, but there are rumors of upgrades to the new SA-10 Grumble and
     SA-12 Gladiator systems.
        Local military forces make use of the SA-7 and SA-14 shoulder-fired
     missiles. These are also popular terrorist weapons, and can be expected
     in the vicinity of terrorist camps, Libyan army units use various
     medium-range SAMs, including the SA-8, -9, -11, and -13. However, these
     are not always in the best state of repair.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Air Force

        Fighters: The Libyan Air Force is primarily composed of MiG-23MF
     "Flogger" fighters, with over 140 craft in inventory. It also has a
     smaller number of MiG-25 "Foxbats" for reconnaissance and long-range
     interception, as well as some antiquated MiG-21s. The Air Force also
     has various Mirage 5D fighter-bombers for ground attack missions.
        Intelligence expects that MiG-23s and 25s will be your primary air-
     to-air opponents, although in Conventional War, or against higher
     quality pilots, you
                                                                     - 108 -
     may encounter the new MiG-29 "Fulcrum" flown by Soviet personnel.
        Reconnaissance Bombers: Although Libya does not possess any Tu-95
     "Bear" reconnaissance bombers, Russian planes of this type frequently
     operate from Libyan bases.
        Airborne Early Warning & Control: Libya has no AEW&C craft. No
     Russian Il-76 "Mainstays" are expected to use Libyan bases, since they
     are too precious. In wartime Libya is a distant outpost in the middle
     of NATO's great strength in the Western Mediterranean. Aircraft losses
     would be high - too high to permit risking the rare and costly AEW&C
     craft.
        Air Transports: It is suspected that Libya's antiquated fleet of
     C-130H and C-47 air transports (built in America) will be replaced
     with Russian equipment, perhaps including the new An-72 "Coaler" jet
     transport.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Navy

        The Libyan Navy is primarily composed of Missile Corvettes and
     Missile Patrol Boats. The largest of these are the 770-ton Russian-built
     Nanuchka II class armed with Styx surface-to-surface missiles, SA-N-4
     surface-to-air missiles, and a twin 57mm gun turret. The other boats
     include the Russian Osa-class, Italian-built Wadi M'ragh class and the
     French-built La Combattante II types; these have poorer missiles and
     SA-N-5 SAMs, or no SAMs at all.
        The Nanuchkas are the best boats in the Libyan Navy. They perform
     the most aggressive patrols, making them the primary threat. Patrols
     occur frequently in the Gulf of Sirte, south of the "Line of Death".
     Sometimes the Libyan air force flies fighter missions in support of
     the patrols.
                                                                     - 109 -

                                The Persian Gulf
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Introduction

        Politics: Iran has been ruled by Shi'ite (a Moslem sect) radicals
     since their overthrow of the pro-American Shah in 1979. In September,
     1980 Iraq attacked Iran, beginning a long, costly war between those
     nations. Both contestants are viewed with distrust by the Arab states
     along the south of the Persin Gulf. Iran's use of international
     terrorism as a tool of foreign policy has not improved the nation's
     image.
        Iran also calls for a Shi'ite religious revolution throughout the
     Islamic world. This naturally bothers the leadership of the Arab states,
     since their governments are Sunni (another Moslem sect). However, Iran
     is populated by Persians, not Arabs. So far this cultural and linguistic
     barrier has hindered the spread of Iranian Shi'ite radicalism across the
     Persian Gulf to the Arab states.
        Military Forces: Under the Shah, Iran's oil-rich finances permitted
     massive investment in military forces, mostly from the USA. Since the
     revolution many complex weapons have failed for lack of spare parts and
     maintenance, while most of the rest were damaged or destroyed in the war
     with Iraq. Iran has some sophisticated aircraft and missiles remaining,
     but these are deployed to protect key cities in the interior, rather
     than as a border defense.
        Geography: Iran is a large nation with varied geography. The Elbruz
     and Zagros mountain ranges run from the northwest corner (where Iran
     touches Turkey and the Soviet trans-Caucasus) diagonally southeast,
     along the border with Iraq, and then parallel to the Persian Gulf. South
     of these mountains, at the head of the Gulf, are Iran's oilfields. North
     of the mountains the nation is divided into two regions. The western
     part, near Iraq, Turkey, and trans-Caucasus Russia, is fertile, heavily
     populated, and includes most of the major cities and industrial plants.
     The eastern part, bordering Pakistan, Afghanistan, and Soviet Central
     Asia, is mostly barren deserts and mountains with a small, impoverished,
     undereducated population.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Level of Conflight

        Cold War: Iran's use of terrorism has been very effective to data.
     America's confused policy respons, culminating in the Iran-Contra
     scandal, is one example. However, eventually the continue violence may
     provoke a military response from the Western nations.
        Limited War: Iran and Iraq have been fighting a limited war since
     1980. The cities of Abadan and Basra, on the national border where the
     Tigris-Euphrates rivers empty into the Gulf, are largely ruined by the
     fighting. Running northward are two opposing lines of trenches and
     bunkers with a "no-man's land" between.
        Each side attempted to discourage Persian Gulf shipping from aiding
     the opposition, resulting in missile and rocket attacks on many
     freighters and tankers. In 1987 and 1988 American fleet units escorting
     oil tankers became involved in surface battles with Iranian ships and
     boats, as well as an
                                                                     - 110 -
     unfortunate civilian airliner that flew through a battle area and was
     shot down by the somewhat inept crew of the missile cruiser USS
     Vincennes.
        Conventional War: Russia could invade Iran as part of a wider
     NATO-Warsaw Pact conflict, or as a counter to the Shi'ite radicals, who
     would like to spread their revolution to the USSR's Moslem population.
     America may be drawn into invading Iran by its confused foreign policy.
     The vast and often hostile geography, not to mention a large and
     hostile population, argue against traditional military invasions.
     Instead, a gradual escalation from limited war, including bigger and
     deeper air attacks, is more probable.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Friendly Bases

        America's strongest allies in the Persian Gulf are Saudi Arabia and
     the tiny island kingdom of Bahrain.
        CV Nimitz at Sea (KY83): This huge 80000-ton nuclear carrier is the
     class ship of the latest and most powerful program of aircraft carriers.
     Normally assigned to the Pacific Fleet, it is prepared to visit the
     Indian Ocean at any time. Here it sails with a close escort of
     destroyes, and has its F-18s on regular rotation in CAP (combat air
     patrol).
        American aircraft carriers do not sail into the restricted waters of
     the Persian Gulf, where they would be "sitting ducks" for land-based air
     and missile attacks. Carrier task forces remain in the Indian Ocean,
     although the Nimitz and her ring of close escorts have sailed deep into
     the Gulf of Oman, to provide a base as close as possible to Persian Gulf
     targets. If threatened the ship can always sail to the southeast and
     escape into the vast expanses of the Indian Ocean.
        Ras as Saffaniyah (JY19): This is Saudi Arabia's northenmost oil
     terminal and port along the Gulf. Its airfield is in a useful strategic
     location. Basing privileges for a secret "stealth" mission can be
     arranged with the pro-American Saudi monarchy.
        Dhahram (JY54) & Al Hufuf (JY44): Dhahram is Saudi Arabia's largest
     port city on the Persian Gulf, making its airfield and unwise choice for
     stealth aircraft operations. However, the Al Hufuf airfield slightly
     inland is a strategically useful and less public position for basing
     missions and raids. Either can be used for stealth missions, although
     Al Hufuf is preferable.
        As Salamiyah (JY00): This small airbase outside of the capital Riyadh
     is a nice, quite location where clandestine missions can be organized
     easily. Unfortunately, the gulf coast is far away.
        Bahrain (JY65): This small island nation is strongly pro-American,
     providing large naval and air base facilities for American military
     forces. It is fairly easy to operate stealth missions from here.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Neutral Bases

        Kuwait is a friendly neutral nation, Oman is neutral but pro-Western,
     and the UAE are studiously neutral.
        Kuwait City in Kuwait (JZ12): Originally neutral, Iranian threats and
     attacks caused Kuwait to seek US military aid and support. The Kuwait
     airport can be used to occasionally stage missions that demonstrate
     America's
                                                                     - 111 -
     support to Kuwait, or for emergency landings. However, Kuwait is fearful
     of provoking more Iranian hostility, and therefore will not grant
     America basing rights. Besides, they'd like to stay on the good side of
     the Soviet Union too!
        Kuwaits great oil fields are south of the city, in ONC JZ20 and JZ30.
        Qatar (JY75): This small independent nation works hard at the
     appearance of neutrality, probably because it has strong pro-American
     and strong pro-Iranian factions. Although missions cannot be staged
     regularly from here, it is possible to use the pro-American groups to
     aid in specific clandestine missions or emergency landing situations.
        Ruweiss (KY01) & Tarif (KY11): These small oil ports of the United
     Arab Emirates are not especially friendly to the American cause. Because
     the UAE is a decentralized government, pressure and money in the right
     places could permit a clandestine mission or emergency landing.
        Some of the largest oil fields of the UAE are in this area
     (ONC KY22-23).
        Abu Dhabi (KY31): Abu Dhabi is the major city of the United Arab
     Emirates (UAE), where the appearance of neutrality is most important.
     Staging missions or emergency landings from this base is very difficult,
     but not impossible if Iranian diplomacy succeeds in making yet more
     enemies.
        Al Khafi at Dubai (KY65): This large airfield, outside the city of
     Dubai, is the most strategically useful of all UAE airfields. It is the
     base closest to south-central Iran, and as such an important launching
     or retrieval point for deep missions. However, as at Abu Dhabi,
     political problems make the use of this base difficult to impossible.
        Muscat in Oman (KY90): Oman is careful to remain neutral in all
     affairs, but is strongly pro-Western. For example, much of its army is
     trained and officered by "retired" British military personnel. The
     military portion of the Muscat airfield is available for missions and
     emergency landings, provided everything remains secret and politically
     "deniable".

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     The Sights in the Persian Gulf

        The Persian Gulf is a desert region, not unlike Libya, except for
     the large, high spine of mountains that runs diagonally through Iran
     from the northwest to the southeast. However, water is more plentiful,
     especially in Iran, resulting in increased agriculture and a large
     number of local irrigation works to control the seasonal run-off from
     the mountain highlands.
        The Gulf has many interesting and exceptional areas, such as the
     Tigris-Euphrates watershed that reaches the head of the gulf around
     Abadan. Once a great seaport and teaming metropolis, the destruction
     of the Iran-Iraq war has reduced the area to a ruin of small towns and
     villages.
        Kharg Island, despite wartime attacks, remains one of the great
     wonders of the world. Surrounded by oil platforms and supertankers,
     guarded by missile boats and fighter patrols, it remains the site of
     numerous refineries and oil storage tanks. There are also great
     oilfields south of Kuwait City, north of Bushehr in the Bandar-e-Rig,
     on Bahrain and Qatar, and along the UAE coastline near Ruweiss and
     Tarif, as well as assorted individual platforms
                                                                     - 112 -
     along the Arabian Gulf coast.
        Another interesting region of Iran is the great valley of
     Bandar-e-Lengeh and Bandar 'Abbas. Seasonal rivers, flowing from the
     mountains, have formed a fertile valley floor that empties into the
     Straits of Hormuz, the strategic doorway to the Persian Gulf. On the
     opposite side (the southern side) of the straits, the mountainous
     peninsula of Musandam knifes into the straits, creating a narrow
     choke-point of naval traffic.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Iran

        Upper Khuzestan Triangle - Dezful (JZ38), Masjed Soleyman (JZ47),
     Ahvaz (JZ37): These cities are the main "rear areas" behind the
     Iraq-Iran battlefront. They have a variety of SAMs. Although all
     originally had airbase facilities, it is believed that only Masjed
     Soleyman's is still intact.
        Abadan (JZ24): This city is located at the final junction of the
     Tigris and Euphrates Rivers, just before they empty into the Persian
     Gulf. Numerous battles in and around this area have destroyed a large
     part of the city. The surrounding countryside, once contained with
     dikes and irrigation projects, is now reverting to a poisonous
     marshland in the aftermath of heavy fighting, which included the use
     of poison gas.
        Bandar Khomenyi (JZ44): This is the main Iranian military base
     behind the southern part of the Iran-Iraq front, and a major staging
     base for military supplies and munitions of all sorts. It has a large
     airbase, powerful SAM batteries, and a major military headquarters.
        Bandar-e-Rig Oil Fields: These oil fields, clustered along the coast
     and inland hills (JZ61 and JZ71) are a key source of Iran's oil wealth.
        Kharg Island (JZ60): This island is covered with refineries, oil
     storage tanks, and port facilities for oil tankers. Until the Iran-Iraq
     war it was the greatest oil terminal in the world. Repeated attacks
     have ruined many of the facilities, but never all of them. Now
     protected by SAM batteries, and missile boat patrols, it is still
     Iran's main port for oil export.
        Much of Iran's oil wealth is slightly offshore. One of the heaviest
     concentrations of oil platforms exists in the vicinity of Kharg Island.
     Beware that some platforms are now used by Iranian Shi'ite "Guards" as
     military bases.
        Bushehr (JZ80): This important coastal city was once a major oil
     port, but is now completely overshadowed by neighboring Kharg Island.
     The military forces on its airbase, and the SAM batteries, are not
     always first rate. However, it is home port for many Iranian frigates
     and missile boats that patrol the gulf.
        Shiraz (KZ03): This inland city, sited on a highland plateau, is one
     of the largest Iranian cities. It is also the nerve center and main
     headquarters for Iran's southern military command - the forces
     responsible for the Persian Gulf. There is an exceptionally large
     military airbase here, and it is usually protected by a powerful SAM
     battery.
        Esfahan (JZ89): This inland city, nestled in a large col of the
     Zagros Mountains, is the classic "gateway" to northwestern Iran. As a
     transportation and population center it naturally boasts an airfield,
     and SAM sites protecting
                                                                     - 113 -
     it. The current state of the Iran-Iraq war has a powerful effect on
     what sorts of aircraft are based here.
        Yazd (KZ38) and Kerman (KZ84): These two cities are distant
     population centers on the edge of the Iranian deserts. Both cities are
     dominated by a strong traditionalist sentiment, which in recent years
     has translted into fervent Shi'ite extremism. However, the huge war
     losses are causing many families to reconsider their support for the
     Jihad.
        Bandar-e Lengeh (KY57): This western city on the Straits of Hormuz
     has a minor military base, including an airfield and SAM battery.
     However, its primary function is civilian, serving the large oil fields
     in this area.
        Seasonal rivers running from the mountains to the west down into
     Bandar-e Lengeh have a variety of interesting road and rail bridges over
     them.
        Offshore Oil Platforms are especially common in KY35-45.
        Bandar 'Abbas (KY68): This city is Iran's major military base on the
     Straits of Hormuz. Major Iranian Navy elements are based here, as well
     as the latest SAMs and a large, well equipped military airbase.
        Secret Bases: Western intelligence operatives in Iran are preparing
     two secret, hard-pack surfaces suitable for aircraft landings. One is in
     the Shalamzar valley (JZ67) in the Zagros Mountains, the other in the
     mountains south of Kerman, at KZ82.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Air Defenses

        HAWK batteries are Iran's longest ranged surface-to-air missiles.
     Nearly exhausted in fighting with Iraq, these weapons are formidable
     defenders of Iran once more. The reason? A large shipment of parts and
     spare missiles by Lt. Colonel Oliver North, USMC. He hoped to trade
     them for American hostages in Lebanon. Iran got the missiles, the
     hostages remained in Lebanon, and North resigned from the Marines
     Corps. Think about that when one fires at you!
        Rapier batteries, sold by Britain to Iran, are fast, but shorter
     ranged, and hindered by a fire control system that is primarily visual,
     with the radar intended originally as backup. The Rapier radar system
     never approached the quality or sophistication of the HAWK. In fact,
     in the Falkland Islands fighting, the Rapier was surprisingly
     ineffective.
        The Tigercat, an antiquated British design, appears in less-important
     areas. Many Tigercat sites have little or no radar, since the missile is
     designed for visual control. The Seacat is a naval version of the
     Tigercat, found on Iranian Vosper Mk 5 type frigates. It is somewhat
     more dangerous because the frigates have decent radar search systems.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Iranian Air Force

        This service arm is composed primarily of American-built aircraft
     acquired during the Shah's rule. Before the outbreak of the Iran-Iraq
     war the Air Force had a nominal strength of 75 F-14 Tomcats, about 200
     F-4D and F-4E Phantom IIs, 140 F-5E Tiger IIs, plus various other planes
     and helicopters, including C-130 Hercules transports and P-3F Orion
     reconnaissance bombers.
        Fighters: Iran lacks the sophisticated technicians and parts to keep
     its F-14s operational. Within a year after the revolution fewer than
     five were
                                                                     - 114 -
     functional. No missiles or parts exist for the long-range Phoenix AAM
     system, but some F-14s still have functional long-range radars. F-14s
     can carry AIM-7F Sparrows or AIMN-9H Sidewinders.
        The older but less effective F-4s and F-5s are easier to maintain.
     These planes are the backbone of the Iranian fighting air force,
     intercepting Iraqi raids, guarding rear areas and ships from attack,
     and occasionally attempting a raid into Iraqi territory.
        Iranian fighters are equipped with AIM-9H Sidewinders, one of the
     last and best first-generation IR AAMs. The F-4 Phantoms (but not the
     F-5 Tigers) are designed to carry the AIM-7F Sparrow, a long range
     radar-homing missile.
        Reconnaissance Bombers: Iran has few naval reconnaissance bombers,
     and most of those are P-3C Orions with inoperative electronic gear.
     Such planes are reduced to making visual patrols only - a waste of
     aviation fuel in a modern warfare environment!
        However, it's possible that long-range Russian Tu-95 "Bear" bombers
     may make an appearance, flying from Afghanistan or Yemen.
        Airborne Early Warning & Control: Iran has no "AWACS" or other AEW&C
     aircraft. Instead, the few operational F-14s are used in this role,
     since the F-14 has an extremely powerful air search radar.
        Air Transports: Iran has a variety of small, medium and large air
     transports, including the American C-130 Hercules, German Fokker F.27,
     French Dassault-Breguet Falcon 20, and Boeing 707 and 747 transport
     models. The exact types available vary greatly, depending on the supply
     of spare parts and the presence of knowledgeable mechanics. Given
     Iran's dislike of the West, some consider it likely that she will shop
     in Russia for the next transports bought, perhaps the new and very
     flexible An-72 Coaler.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Navy

        The Iranian Navy has suffered greatly in the Iran-Iraq war, since
     most resources go into the army and air force. Many ships were damaged
     in the fighting and remain unrepaired; others have deteriorated badly
     for lack of maintenance. The great naval base at Khorramshahr, near
     Abadan, was destroyed early in the war and remains a ruin in no-man's
     land.
        It is believed that one or more of the four Vosper Mark 5 frigates
     are still functional. These 1100-ton ships include a Seacat SAM
     surface-to-air missiles, system and a 4.5" gun turret. Occasional
     patrols by these or smaller ships can be expected in the region of
     Kharg Island or in the Straits of Hormuz. If functional, the Vosper
     frigates pose a significant military threat.
        Iran's Shi'ite "Guards" also man a large number of fast motorboats.
     The crew carry rocket-propelled grenades to attack shipping, and
     shoulder-launched IR SAMs to protect themselves from air and helicopter
     attack. Virtually invisible, these "mosquitos" are a threat only to
     unarmed merchant shipping, or an aircraft unlucky enough to pass over
     the area. These boats are based all along the Iranian coast, especially
     at Bandar 'Abbas, and from a variety of offshore oil platforms.
                                                                     - 115 -
                                 The North Cape
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Introduction

        Politics: The North Cape area is shared by four nations. West to
     east, they are Norway, Sweden, Finland, and the Soviet Union. Their
     political orientation parallel their geographic locations: Norway
     belongs to NATO, Sweden is a pro-Western neutral, neutral Finland
     accomodates the Soviets, and the Soviet Union, of course, leads the
     Eastern bloc.
        Military Forces: In terms of global politics, the North Cape is the
     single most important military region in the Soviet Union. Murmansk is
     Russia's only year-round open-sea access to the Atlantic ocean. Russian
     SSBNs (ballastic missile nuclear submarines), the heart of nuclear
     deterrence, sail from here into the Atlantic and Arctic oceans. The
     Soviet Northern Fleet protects these invaluable weapons, as well as
     maintaining a credible threat to NATO's Atlantic lifelines.
        NORWAY fields a large, tough force tailored for a dogged defense of
     its mountainous homeland. Reasonably well-equipped, the majority of the
     forces guard the populous southern regions. The northern bases have only
     token garrisons. Northern Norway seems more important to NATO than it is
     to the Norwegians, since important NATO air, naval and marine troop
     assets are planned to reinforce this area in time of war.
        SWEDEN's armed forces are designed to make the Russians (or anyone)
     think twice about violating that country's neutrality. The forces are
     well equipped and well trained, with a nationwide reserve system that
     makes a large part of the citizenry part-time soldiers. However, the
     northern part of Sweden is almost unpopulated, so the defenses there
     are considerably lighter.
        Recently Sweden has been greatly irritated by Russian midget
     submarines literally crawling around inside her fleet bases, and by a
     Russian diesel sub that ran aground in a harbour entrance while carrying
     a nuclear-tipped torpedo (a serious insult to anti-nuclear Sweden). As a
     result, Sweden may be willing to support NATO clandestine operations as
     a form of revenge.
        FINLAND fields a much smaller and less sophisticated force than its
     neighbours. Although fiercly independent, Finland has learned to
     accomodate the desires of its powerful neighbour, the Soviet Union. The
     Soviets maintain this "friendly" attitude by garrisoning powerful
     military forces near the Finnish border, and strongly encouraging
     Finland to buy Soviet military equipment. So even if Finland could
     detect F-19 overflights in its northern regions, it's unclear whether
     it would bother informing its "friend" Russia immediately.
        Geography: This entire region is a harshly cold climate. Northern
     Norway is a long, mountainous country with a harsh climate and "iron"
     (rocky) seacoast. In this terrain a small group of determined defenders
     could stop an army for years. The "open" areas of Finland and Sweden
     are deceptive. On the map it may appear to be an open plain, perfect
     for attack. In reality it's a frigid wilderness in the winter and a
     vast, marshy bog in the summer.
                                                                     - 116 -
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Level of Conflict

        Cold war: Because of the potential threat posed by the Northern
     Fleet's ships and aircraft to the shipping lanes in the Atlantic, NATO
     and Russian forces are constantly sparring with each other, testing the
     other's responses and jockeying for position should hostilities break
     out. Officially at peace, the two sides wage a covert conflict of
     intelligence gathering and military posturing that can turn deadly at
     any instant.
        Limited War: If Russian or American foreign policy was conducted
     with greater hostilty, the North Cape would make an ideal place for
     Western raids of retaliations against the Soviets. Similarly, their air
     and sea defences could get excessively "trigger happy" and shoot before
     asking questions. Even among men of good faith, there is always a
     temptation to send in a secret mission to "take out" something that
     really bothers you. Israel and South Africa, for example, have
     surrendered to this temptation from time to time.
        Conventional War: The baloon's gone up. NATO and the Warsaw Pact are
     officially shooting at each other in this part of Europe (perhaps
     elsewhere too). The Northern Fleet is making a sortie into the Atlantic,
     Soviet troops have crossed the border into Norway, Mainstays and MiGs
     are clouding the skies. Now missions are no joke at all. Getting in and
     out with your skin intact will be very, very tricky!

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Friendly Bases

        The two Norwegian land bases here are civilian airfields, but both
     are closer to the Russian border than the NATO bases at Banak and Bardu.
     It is easy and wise to stage stealth missions through either Lakselv or
     Kautokeino, rather than flying longer distances from more rearward
     fields. Such staging could be just a quick landing and refueling both
     inbound and outbound. In effect, the fields can function as grounded
     refueling tankers.
        Kautokeino (WX11): Located in the barren tundra of the
     Finnmarksvidda, Kautokeino airfield is well suited for operations across
     the top of Finland to Murmansk. The population is very small and the
     entire area well defended by tundra swamps and bogs in the summer, or
     sub-zero blizzards in the winter.
        Lakselv (WX34): Located at the inland end of the Porsangen Fjord,
     Lakselv town has an airfield ideally suited to operations into Russia.
     It is far enough from the border to survive the first few days of
     fighting, but close enough for easy flying.
        CV Kennedy at Sea (WX67): In the middle 1980s the Secretary of the
     Navy announced a new policy - a wartime policy of sending aircraft
     carriers deep into the Norwegian Sea, to challenge Russia's fleet near
     its home ports. Although considered suicidal by some, this policy is
     certainly useful for launching stealth missions. Here CV67, one of the
     conventional carriers with the US Atlantic Fleet, makes a quick dash to
     the North Cape to launch your mission. As always, the carrier is
     accompanied by a screen of escorts, and is constantly launching and
     recovering a CAP of F-18s.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Neutral Bases

        Available neutral bases in this region are all Swedish. Sweden is
     strictly neutral in international politics, but economically closely
     tied to the Western
                                                                     - 117 -
     bloc. Given recent events and aggressive Russian moves, it's not
     unlikely that a few clandestine stealth missions, or emergency landings,
     would be allowed at northern Swedish airbases. 
        Kiruna (WW28): The northernmost airfield in Sweden, this base is
     located in the nearly unpopulated foothills of the Esrange mountains.
     Stealth missions could operate easily from this area, with nobody but
     reindeer to observe the events.
        Gallivare (WW26): Although this airfield is also far north in
     Sweden, Gallivare town is a junction of rails and roads. In the summer
     months it is also a popular tourist area, with the Muddus National Park
     a few miles to the west. Stealth missions operating from this base must
     be very discreet.
        Lulea (WW13): This fairly populous city is the main Swedish military
     base in the Northern Region. It is also a port on the Gulf of Bothnia,
     the northernmost arm of the Baltic sea.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     The Land of the Midnight Sun

        The North Cape (Nordkapp in Norwegian) is a realm of extremes. In
     summer the sun shines throughout the night, while in winter it never
     rises above the horizon.
        The most northerly areas are realms of tundra and permafrost - ground
     that remains frozen thoughout the year, save for the top few inches in
     the summer. Only moss and coarse grass grows here, although it can turn
     brilliant green on good summer days.
        The majority of the region is taiga, vast pine forests that are home
     to reindeer, artic fox, and rock ptarmigan. The southerly lowlands are
     a deep watershed, full of small lakes, marshes and bogs. The White Sea
     coastline is almost entirely marsh as the land blends gradually into
     sea.
        The interior of the Kola Peninsula has the characteristic mountains
     of a tundra-taiga borderland: low, rolling, rocky and bare, with pockets
     of snow even in summer. The Norwegian coast has more dramatic terrain.
     Here is the topmost end of the spine of mountains that divides Norway
     from Sweden. Even here they are still steep, bare rock with clinging
     patches of ice and snow.
        Amid this monotonous, desolute terrain are impressive human works,
     especially the city of Murmansk with its sprawling military complexes.
     Hideously expensive to build and maintain through the long, deep winter,
     this region is surely the most valuable military real estate in the
     world, judging by money invested per acre!

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Northwestern Russia

        Murmansk (XX11): This major city is Russia's only year-round port on
     the Atlantic ocean. Its great piers and depots support not only a steady
     stream of merchant shipping, but the powerful Red Banner Northern fleet.
     Murmansk is literally "at the end of the line", in this case a long
     railway line that runs southward 700 miles to Leningrad.
        Murmansk is also the nerve centre of Russia's powerful airforces,
     including both PVO air defence planes and Naval Aviation of the Northern
     fleet. Satellite airfields surround the city, including large bases at
     Kildenstroy (XX10) and
                                                                     - 118 -
     Kilpyaur (XX00). The Northern fleet includes, roughly, one aircraft
     carrier, 75 other major surface warships, one marine brigade, 133
     submarines, and 446 naval aircraft. The protection of its bases is the
     duty of 12 Divisions of army troops (about 300000 men total) and 150
     planes of Tactical Aviation (airforce planes supporting the army) and
     the PVO (airforce interceptors guarding the border).
        The great Severomorsk (XX31) submarine pens are also just outside of
     Murmansk. This underground base is the home port for the new Typhoon
     class of ballistic missile subs, as well as many other diesel and
     nuclear undersea craft.
        Pechenga (WX91): This town is Russia's forwardmost military base in
     the far north. Just a few miles from the Norwegian border, Pechenga is
     the inevitably staging point for any invasion into NATO territory.
     Although it has an airbase and strong SAM defenses, the Polyarnyy
     airbase complex to the east (in WX80) is somewhat larger.
        Monchegorsk (XW18) & Olenegorsk (XW19): These two towns, near the
     base of the Kola peninsula, are major airbases for long-range naval
     aviation bombers, as well as providing fighter and SAM cover to the
     railroad link between Murmansk and the south.
        Kandalaksha (XW16): This small city is the main population centre at
     the base of the Kola peninsula. It is primarily a transportation hub,
     with rail lines and a naval port that faces eastward, into the White
     Sea.
        South of the city lies the Loukhi (XW04) air defense complex,
     including a large SAM battery that covers this section of the
     Murmansk-Leningrad rail line.
        Kem (XW21): South of Kandalaksha, Kem is the next significant city
     along the Murmansk-Leningrad line. It too is a small port facing onto
     the White Sea. It is also the starting point for the Voknavolok rail
     line that runs westward to the Finnish border. This is a purely military
     line, intended to support the Russian military presence on the Finnish
     border.
        Arkhangel'sk (XW71): This city is Russia's largest port on the
     Atlantic. Although closed by ice during the winter, it has much better
     rail and road connections to the interior of Russia, and is almost
     totally invulnerable to enemy attack. In addition to large port
     facilities, the city is surrounded by military defenses, the most
     notable being the complexes at Severodvinsk (XW51) and Kushkushara
     (XW84). In addition, units of the Northern Fleet patrol offshore in the
     White Sea.
        Secret Bases: Western intelligence operatives in this area have
     secretly created two hard-frozen airstrips suitable for landings, one
     at XW57, the other at XX20.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Air Defenses

        The Kola peninsula is vital to the Soviet Union because of the access
     it affords to NATO's lines of communications, but its very proximity
     also makes it particularly vulnerable to NATO counterstrokes.
     Consequently, the Kola
                                                                     - 119 -
     Peninsula is likely to prove one of the most challenging anti-aircraft
     environments in the world today.
        In clandestine missions it may prove impossible to penetrate and
     escape this area without eliminating at least one radar system. However,
     you get lucky - the systems often shut down for varying periods of time
     due to maintenance difficulties in this most rigorous of climates.
        Long Range SAMs: These are area defense weapons that, along with
     fighters, are your primary opposition. The older SA-2s and SA-5s have
     been undergoing continual upgrade to SA-10 and SA-12 quality. The
     entire system is enhanced by the LPAR early warning system at Kirovsk.
        Light SAMs: Soviet ground forces in this area are outfitted with the
     usual battlefield SAMs, including the older SA-9 and SA-13 IR missiles,
     as well as the newer SA-8 and SA-11 radar guided missiles. Mobile
     infantry carrying SA-7 and SA-14 shoulder-launched IR SAMs are a
     significant threat as well. Check out your intelligence briefing
     (preflight) for "special event" areas showing the latest enemy troop
     concentrations.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     The PVO and Naval Aviation

        Fighters: This region is defended partly by the PVO units, with
     long-range MiG-25 and MiG-31 interceptors using long-range radar-homing
     AAMs. Naval aviation fighters operating from either carriers or land
     strips include the Yak-38 V/STOL jet and the new Su-27 multi-purpose
     fighter. During wartime shorter-ranged units may arrive, including
     MiG-29 and SU-27 dogfighters with short-range IR missiles as well as
     long-range radar weapons.
        All these planes but the Yak-38 are worthy opponents. The Yak can
     only carry IR homing missiles (generally AA-8 Aphids). It is
     considerably slower and less flexible than the other fighters.
        Reconnaissance Bombers: Many long-range Tu-95D "Bears" are based
     in this area, to keep tabs on NATO naval activity in the North Atlantic.
     A nuisance in peacetime, these planes pose a serious threat in a war.
     Eliminating them is always a high priority in NATO war plans. That would
     blind the Russian high command to activities in the Atlantic and
     Norwegian seas.
        Transports: Russia possesses numerous air transports for its huge
     force of airborne units. The most modern of these is the jet propelled
     An-72 "Coaler", which is particularly suited to fast, high priority
     missions like inserting commando teams or transporting critical command
     personnel.
        AEW & C Aircraft: The Soviets routinely deploy Il-76 "Mainstay"
     aircraft in this region. The 300+ mile radars on this plane may be your
     most formidable enemy. If you're spotted and can't discover how or by
     whom, chances are it's a Mainstay.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     The Red Banner Northern

        Russia's Northern Fleet offers both tempting targets and a
     significant threat. Its modern Sovremennyy-class destroyers carry SA-N-7
     missiles, while the numerous Krivak-class frigates sport the SA-N-4. The
     larger Kiev-class carrier has the powerful SA-N-6, a sea-going
     equivalent to the SA-10. These warships are more than capable of
     defending themselves. Stationed off the
                                                                     - 120 -
     northern coast, they significantly extend the Soviet anti-aircraft
     umbrella.
        In addition to these ships' SAMs, the Kiev carries a complement of
     Yak-38 "jump-jet" fighter aircraft. While less capable than ground-based
     fighters, the British Harriers in the Falklands taught the world not to
     underestimate the capabilities of such planes.
        An upcoming addition to the northern fleet is a class of huge
     aircraft carriers fitting out in the Crimea. Tentatively titled the
     "Kremlin" class, these ships are expected to join the Northern Fleet
     soon.
                                                                     - 121 -
                                 Central Europe
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Introduction

        Politics: Central Europe is where the full force of East and West
     meet. Since World War II Europe has been two hostile Blocs, with a few
     neutrals balanced between. On one side are the communist East European
     nations, created in the wake of Soviet armies at the end of WWII. On the
     other side are democratic Western European nations, created by the USA
     and Britain in the wake of their armies during WWII. Since 1949 the West
     has been linked by NATO. In 1955 the East formalized an equivalent
     organization, the Warsaw Pact, dominated by the USSR. From then to now
     the two greatest military organizations on earth have uneasily eyed each
     other along the German border.
        Military Forces: The Warsaw Pact can deploy almost three million men,
     about 80000 armored fighting vehicles, and 6000 combat aircraft. Against
     this juggernaut, the Western powers can field around two million men,
     40000 AFV's, and 4000 combat aircraft. The numerical imbalance is
     partially offset by the higher quality of the Western troops and
     equipment, presumably along with the traditional advantages of being the
     defender.
        Together, the two sides have almost ten thousand nuclear weapons for
     battlefield use in Europe. These range from small, sub-kiloton shells
     designed to wipe out troop concentrations, up to multi-megaton city
     busters. Artillery, planes, and missiles of all types and ranges can
     deliver these weapons. At one time NATO felt it had to use nuclear
     weapons to compensate for numerical inferiority. Today it has an
     alternative plan: "Air-land battle, 2000". In this NATO uses superior
     technology, including its stealth planes, to attack deep in the rear of
     the Warsaw Pact armies, destroying their logistical support. If this
     innovative strategy works NATO need not use nuclear weapons to stem the
     Red tide. However, if this fails, NATO must choose between a nuclear
     holocaust and the conquest of Europe by the Soviet Union.
        Geography: The "Central Front" stretches 1000 kilometers through the
     middle of Germany, bordered on the north by the Baltic Sea, and on the
     south by the Alps. The initial strategic objective of a Russian invasion
     would almost certainly be the Rhine river, only 150 kilometers from the
     frontier (at the closest point).
     West German terrain is mildly favourable to the defender, especially in
     the forested and hilly southern half. The broad, flat North German Plain
     is the traditional invasion route. But every few kilometers there is a
     new town, village or city. Each could become a new defensive bastion.
        One often neglected geographic consideration is the terrain to the
     east of the frontier. With the development of the "Air-land battle" this
     region takes on a new significance. The North German plain broadens
     towards the east, encompassing most of East Germany and Poland. It is
     crossed by a number of major rivers flowing northward, channeling road
     and rail traffic into a variety of bridges. This combination of open
     countryside and numerous "choke points" is well suited to air operations.

                                                                     - 122 -
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Level of Conflict

     Cold War: This is the situation of the last 40 years. The two sides
     maintain a wary posture, generally trying to avoid overt provocations,
     probing each other to gain information, stir discontent in the enemy
     population, and gain psychological advantages. The stealth fighter,
     designed for clandestine penetration, is the perfect aircraft for the
     secret operations common in this situation.
        Limited War: Now the conflict is at the brink of open warfare, but
     armies have not yet crossed any borders. As military acts escalate, the
     opportunity for stealth missions increases as well. Military actions are
     political signals that urge the other to back away in forceful terms.
     Unfortunately, sometimes fighting just escalates. This technique was
     successful for America on Grenada and against Libya, but it failed in
     Vietnam. Well, you're just a stealth pilot, carrying out orders.
        Conventional War: This is it! Russian tanks pour over the West German
     border while NATO forces scramble to stem the onrushing tide. On one
     side lies conventional defeat, on the other the disaster of
     thermonuclear war. "Air-land battle, 2000" goes into effect. Stealth
     aircraft, airmobile raiding groups, and long range "smart" munitions
     make the dangerous crossing over the front to hammer Soviet rear
     echelons. If they can isolate the Russian spearheads from their base,
     they may give the politicians an opportunity to avert disaster.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Friendly Bases

        West Germany, Holland, and Denmark are studded with airfields that
     could serve as bases for stealth raids into Eastern Europe. They form a
     gentle, north-south crescent bulging west in the middle. Which is the
     most suitable starting point for a particular airstrike depends mainly
     on the location of the target. However, the stealth fighter's unique
     characteristics will be most affective in the areas only thinly covered
     by radar to the north and south of the main arena. Therefore, deep
     penetration raids will usually start from Denmark or Southern Germany.
     Shorter tactical strikes, however, must fly directly into the mouth of
     the tiger.
        Jutland Peninsula - Vandel (CC52) & Leck (CB59): These far northern
     bases make ideal jump-off points for raids out across the Baltic. Often
     it's easier to deal with missile boats in the Baltic than the heavier
     SAM defenses in East Germany and Poland.
        Northern Germany (Hanover) - Ahlhorn (CB37) & Gutersloh (CB53): These
     bases, directly behind BAOR (British Army Of The Rhine), face across the
     flat, densely populated North German Plain, the most likely axis of
     advance should the Warsaw Pact attack NATO. Therefore, they represent
     the most direct route to one of the greatest concentrations of hostiles
     in the world.
        Central Germany (Westphalia) - Rhein-main (CB52) & Ramstein (CB50):
     These bases are the great, famous bases of American air power in Europe.
     Rhein-main is one of the largest military bases in the world, while
     Ramstein is headquarters for the 4th Tactical Air Force.
        Southern Germany (Bavaria) - Neuberg (CA68), Leipheim (CA57) &
     Memmingen (CA65): These bases are all Luftwaffe (air force of the

                                                                     - 123 -
     Federal Republic of Germany), but like many German bases, are entirely
     willing to host American aircraft as needed. Any of these bases makes
     an excellent jump-off point for missions into Czechoslovakia.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Sightseeing from the Baltic to Bohemia

        Without doubt, the most impressive sights in this region are the vast
     urban metroplexes, from the northern ports of Hamburg (CB67) and Lubeck
     (CB77) to the old cities of Leipzig (CB82) or Warsaw (DB95), or the
     industrial sprawl of Prague (DB30) and Krakow (DB90). Those northern
     areas not covered with cities, towns or villages are divided into small
     plots of farmland. Much of the area is watered by extensive river
     systems flowing northward. Bridges large and small are common near
     cities. An especially impressive suspension bridge can be found on the
     southwestern outskirts of Hamburg (CB67). The southern part of this
     region is dominated by low mountains that virtually surround the
     Czechoslovakian lowlands of Bohemia (to the west) and Moravia (to the
     east). The valleys and passes amid the mountains provide numerous
     natural routes, and not a few flying challenges. Although much of the
     highland areas were once forested, in the last few decades acid rain has
     denuded many areas and started rampant erosion. The once green mountains
     are now more frequently brown, gray, and black. The much higher Alps,
     capped by perpetual snow, are generally obscured by haze to the
     southwest.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     The Eastern Bloc

     East Germany: During a limited or conventional war the main strength of
     the Warsaw Pact forces will travel through here, surging into West
     Germany. The greates natural barrier in East Germany is the Elbe River,
     running from the Czechoslovakian mountains northward to Hamburg.
     Destroying these river bridges would cut off the Pact's forward troops
     from their supply lines.
        Covering the Pact's forward areas are two main air defense complexes,
     one in the north near Wittstock (CB97) and Wittenburg (CB87), another in
     the south just east of Leipzig and Magdeburg, including the big radars
     at Mittenwalde (CB93) and Grossenhaim (CB92).
        Poland: In a NATO-Pact confict Poland is the "rear area" through
     which Russian troops and supplies would flow toward the front lines.
     Many important headquarters and depots are situated in the central and
     western part of the nation. The Wista-Vistula river system divides
     Poland in half, from north to south. Destroying the road and rail
     bridges can seriously damage Pact operations. Polish defense complexes
     include a powerful system west of Gdansk at Stupsk (DB48), and south of
     Lodz at Radom (DB83). In addition, Warsaw (DB95) is a major
     transportation hub, so active SAM batteries can be expected in that area
     during wartime.
        Czechoslovakia: This Pact nation, seperated from Germany by the
     mountains and the rugged highlands of the Bohemian Forest, is likely to
     play a secondary role in wartime. Czechoslovakian defenses are also
     somewhat lighter than those of East Germany and Poland. Tabor (DA38) is
     the most significant installation. Far to the east, guarding the
     entrance to Hungary and southern Poland, is another defense complex at
     Konmamo (DA87).

                                                                     - 124 -
        Kaliningrad: This region of Russia, named after the major seaport of
     Kaliningrad (renamed from Konigsberg in 1945) at DB89, is the Soviet
     "front line" on the Baltic. It includes a major OTH (over-the-horizon)
     radar station at EB09, as well as the Klaipeda airbase (EC02).

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Air Defenses

        Equipment: Since the "Central Front" forms the focal point of the
     war, the anti-aircraft defenses on both sides are the most intensive in
     the world. The Soviets are certain to deploy large quantities of their
     most modern weapons, SA-10s and SA-12s, for area defense. In some areas
     the older, less effective SA-5 long range systems may still be in place.
        Radar guided SA-8s and SA-11s are the most commonly used for more
     local defenses, especially near important military concentrations or
     objectives. A few are even sited near the larger SAM batteries to
     provide local defense. The shorter-ranged infrared SA-9s and especially
     SA-13s may appear instead if the radar-guided weapons are not available.
        At sea the Baltic missile boats typically have either SA-N-5 or
     SA-N-7 systems, although Krivaks and larger ships with the SA-N-4 can be
     expected in wartime.
        Defended Areas: The whole region is alive with lethal metal. The most
     dangerous areas will undoubtedly be on or near the front lines in West
     Germany, and perhaps at any invasion sites in Denmark. Also beware of
     reserve troop concentrations in East Germany or Poland. But these are
     relative assessments, not absolute. Let down your guard anywhere and
     your aircraft will undoubtedly follow.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Air Forces

        The Soviet Air Force is the largest in the world, and one of the most
     modern. It deploys a wide variety of interceptor, bomber, and support
     aircraft. Some are obsolescent, but many can meet the best of the West.
     The Soviets know the value of air superiority. They'll give high priority
     to that goal in any European war.
        Fighters: As always, the primary foe is another pilot. With 6000
     combat aircraft to chose from, you can bet that the Red Air Force will
     find a few to spare for you. They'll also have the hot new models. If
     you're lucky, you'll only see second-line MiG-23s, but more likely you'll
     encounter quality dogfighters like the MiG-29 and Su-27. In the rear
     areas you're more likely to see long-range interceptors like the MiG-25
     and MiG-31.
        Bombers: The Russians have many different bomber aircraft. One of the
     most troublesome is the Tu-95 "Bear" modified to carry cruise missiles.
     Keeping a number of these craft in orbit deep behind Russian lines gives
     them an "untouchable" airborne nuclear force. Your job as an F-19
     attacker is to prove that this nuclear weapon can be hurt too.
        Airborne Early Warning & Control: The Soviet Il-76 "Mainstay" AEW&C
     was designed for work in this kind of environment. Flying "racetrack"
     orbits deep behind friendly lines, its powerful radars can see NATO air
     operations develop and radio appropriate orders to various fighter
     squadrons.
                                                                     - 125 -

     The effort to develop these planes has been long and costly; the size,
     weight and expense of the electronic gear is gigantic. Each plane is
     precious. Eliminating them would cripple Soviet air operations. The Pact
     appreciates this too, so getting to them won't be an easy job.
        Transports: Thousands of air transports will shuttle back and forth
     on both sides of the front line, carrying troops, raiding parties,
     munitions, staff officers, etc. The new Russian workhorse that flies
     anywhere and carries almost anything is the An-72 "Coaler". Its high
     speed and short-field capability make it the natural choice for secret
     missions, and a natural target for your stealth fighter.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Naval Forces

        The Russian Baltic fleet, headquartered at Baltiysk outside of
     Kaliningrad, controls 4 cruisers, 16 destroyers (many of them
     obsolescent), 7 Krivak-class large frigates, 22 missile boats and other
     light warships, and 21 amphibious assault ships, as well as 45 submarines
     (mostly older diesel-electric models). It also controls the East German
     and Polish navies, which have numerous additional frigates and missile
     boats. This force has two goals: to cover the northern flank of the
     Warsaw Pact from air attack, and to invade Denmark in the event of war.
        Stealth missions will generally deal with the former, your problem
     being how to penetrate the warship screen in the Baltic. Because of the
     many confusing classes of Russian, Polish and East German missile boats
     and frigates, it's always wise to check the data on a ship. The SA-N-5
     is just a first generation IR homer, and no serious threat. The SA-N-4
     uses older pulse radar guidance, but the new SA-N-7 is a more serious
     problem. Fortunately very few Baltic warships carry the powerful,
     long-ranged SA-N-10.
                                                                     - 126 -

                               <<< EMPTY >>>                         - 127 -
                               <<< EMPTY >>>                         - 128 -

                                  5: EQUIPMENT
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Ordnance & Weapon Data Charts

     The charts and tables on the following pages provide a detailed data
     reference for USAF ordnance available to the F-19. Also included is
     equivalent data on enemy aircraft weapons and SAM (Surface-to-Air
     Missile) systems.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     USAF Ordnance Summary

     Weapon
            Max     Max      Guidance     Attack        Attack
     Qty.  Range   Speed      System     Altitude      Technique

     M61A1 20mm Cannon
     -     6km   6000kts   Hist. sight      0' or more    anticipation firing
     AIM-9M Sidewinder
     4     17km  2000kts   IR homing       500' or more   air-to-air f&f
     AIM-120A AMRAAM
     3     32km  2400kts   Radar homing    500' or more   air-to-air f&f
     Penguin-3 ASM
     2     32km  500kts    IR homing       500' or more   air-to-surface f&f
     AGM-84A Harpoon
     1     60km  500kts    Radar homing    500' or more   air-to-surface f&f
     AGM-88A HARM
     1     20km  1400kts   Anti-radar      500' or more   air-to-ground f&f
     AGM-65D Maverick
     2     32km  700kts    Therm. Image    500' or more   air-to-ground f&f
     GBU-12 Paveway
     2     1+km  glides    Laser homing    500' & climb   toss/level bombing
     CBU-72 FAE
     2     1+km  glides    Laser homing    500' & climb   toss/level bombing
     Mk20 Rockeye II
     2     1+km  glides    Laser homing    500' & climb   toss/level bombing
     Mk20 Rockeye
     2     0km   retarded  none            over 500'      level bombing
     Durandal
     2     0km   retarded  none            over 500'      level bombing
     ISC B-1 Minelets
     1     0km   retarded  none            over 500'      level bombing
     Mk82-1 Snakeye
     3     0km   retarded  none            over 500'      level bombing
     Mk35 IN cluster
     1     0km   retarded  none            over 500'      level bombing
     Mk82-0 Slick
     3     0km   freefall  none            over 3000'     level/dive bombing
     Mk122 Fireye
     2     0km   freefall  none            over 3000'     level/dive bombing
     135mm/IR cameras
     1    10km   on plane  fixed viewer    200' or more   level run
     special equipment
     1    0km    retarded  none            500' or more   level run

                                                                     - 129 -
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Key to USAF Ordnance Summary

        Qty: The number of weapons of this type you can carry in one of your
     bay positions (you have four weapons positions). The M61A1 cannon is
     fixed in the nose and always available.
        Weapon: The name of the weapon.
        Max Range: The maximum range at which the weapon can be launched or
     fired effectively.
        A 0km range means the weapon is a free-fall or retarded bomb that
     must be dropped onto the target.
        Max Speed: The speed at which the weapon reaches the target. This is
     given in knots so you can compare it with your own flight speed.
        GLIDES means the weapon 'flies' without power. Therefore your speed,
     at the time of launch, becomes the speed of the weapon.
        RETARDED means the weapon is a retarded bomb that falls away behind
     your craft, decelerating as it drops. Some retarded weapons even open a
     parachute during their descent, to stabilize the fall and line up the
     warhead(s).
        FREE FALL means the weapon is a traditional free-fall bomb that arcs
     downward to the target.
        Guidance System: If the weapon has an onboard targeting system, it is
     mentioned here for general interest.
        Attack Altitude: The recommended altitude for the typical attack
     method. The "500 and up" entry means any altitude above 500' is fine.
     The "500 & climb" entry means that a toss-bombing technique is used
     where the bomb is launched while the plane climbs from 500'.
        Attack Techniques: This references the appropriate attack technique.
     Techniques noted in parenthesis are alternate attack methods that are
     either more dangerous or more difficult to learn. See "How to Fight"
     (pages 56-61) and "Air-to-Ground Tactics" (pages 78-80) for more details.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Key to USAF Ordnance, Effectiveness against Common Targets

     Target Type Abbreviations
     AC: aircraft in flight.
     hgr: airbase hangar, which at military airfields are armored bunkers.
     rwy: airbase runway.
     plns: planes on airbase runways and aprons (i.e., outside of hangars).
     twr: airbase tower, including the tower radars and radios.
     nuc: nuclear power plant.
     brg: bridge over a river.
     bld: buildings, including terrorist camps, offices, warehouses,
          factories, villages, homes, etc.
     bnk: bunker, such as fixed Army HQ sites.
     dep: depot of military fuel and supplies.
     msl: missile launcher, including both fixed launchers and vehicles.
          Launchers may have SAMs or SSMs.
     sam: SAM radar station, usually with SAM missile launchers
     lpar: Large-scale Phased Array Radar station
     oth: Over The Horizon long-range radar station
     plat: offshore oil platform
     refr: oil refinery
     tnks: oil storage tanks
     wel: oil wells
     Sub Pen: underground submarine pens
     Ship: all ships, including cargo ships, warships, and surfaced
           submarines

     Results Abbreviations

        The effectiveness of results is graded like a report card; the higher
     the grade, the more effective the weapon.
        A+, A and A- means the weapons are especially effective against this
     target.
        B+, B and B- means the weapons are of normal accuracy and
     effectiveness against this target.
        C+, C and C- means the weapons are not very effective against this
     target, but may do damage if either you're skillful or lucky (or both).
        D means the weapon has marginal effectiveness against this target.
     You have to be very skillful or very lucky to achieve an effective hit.
        F means the weapon is totally useless against this target. Any
     attacks will be a complete waste of time and ordnance.

                                                                     - 130 -
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     USAF Ordnance: Weapon Effectiveness against Common Targets

                    Airbases:   Struc:  Military: Radars:  Oil:        Sub:
     Weapon      A  H  r  p  t  n  b  b  b  d  m  s  l  o  p  r  t  w  P  S
                 C  g  w  l  w  u  r  l  n  e  s  a  p  t  l  e  n  e  e  h
                    r  y  n  r  c  g  d  k  p  l  m  a  h  a  f  k  l  n  i
                          s                          r     t  r  s        p
     -----------------------------------------------------------------------
     Cannon:
     -------
     M61A1 20 mm
     Cannon      B  F  F  B  B  F  F  B  F  B  B  C- C- C- B  B  B  B  F  C

     Air-to-Air Missiles:
     --------------------
     AIM-9M
     'Sidewinder'A+ F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F
     AIM-120A
     AMRAAM      A- F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F

     Air-to-Ship Missiles:
     ---------------------
     Penguin-3
     ASM         F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  B
     AGM-84A
     'Harpoon'   F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  A-

     Air-to-Ground Missiles:
     -----------------------
     AGM-88A
     HARM        F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  A- A- A- F  F  F  F  F  B+
     AGM-65D
     'Maverick'  F  C- F  C- C  B  B  C  B  C  C  B  B  B  B  B  B  B  B  B

     Laser-guided Bombs:
     -------------------
     CBU-12
     Paveway     F  B  D  C- B  B+ B+ B  B+ B  B  B+ B+ B+ B  B  B  B  F  C
     CBU-72 FAE  F  B  F  F  A- B+ F  A- B+ F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  B+ C-
     Mk 20
     'Rockeye II'F  F  F  B  B  F  F  B  F  B+ B+ B  B  B  B  B+ B+ B+ F  B

     Retarded Bombs:
     ---------------
     Mk 20
     'Rockeye'   F  F  F  B  B  F  F  B  F  B  B  B  B  B  B  B  B  B  F  C
     Durandal    F  F  A+ F  F  D  C- F  D  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F  F
     ISC B-1
     minelets    F  F  A- F  C  F  F  C  F  C- C  F  F  F  F  C  C  C  F  F
     Mk 82-1
     'Snakeye'   F  F  D  B  B  F  F  B  F  B  F  C- C- C- F  B  B  B  F  F
     Mk 35 IN
     cluster     F  D  F  A- B  F  F  B  F  A- A- C  C  C  A- A- A- A- F  C

     Free-fall Bombs:
     ----------------
     Mk 82-0
     'Slick'     F  C  D  C  B  D  D  B  D  B  C- C  C  C  C  B  B  B  F  C
     Mk 122
     'Fireye'    F  C- F  B  B  C- F  B  C- B+ C  C  C  C  C- B+ B+ B+ D  C
                                                                     - 131 -

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Air-to-Air Missiles (AAMs)

     System Name     |
     ----------------+        Guidance       |Effective|   Max  | Maneuver- |
     Nation or plane |         System        |  Range  |  Speed |  ability  |
     -----------------------------------------------------------------------+
     Long-range Radar-Homing
     AA-6 Acrid
     MiG-25           Semi-active Pulse Radar    50km   Mach 4    Poor
     AA-7 Apex
     MiG-23           Semi-active Pulse Radar    34km   Mach 3    Poor
     AA-9 Amos
     MiG-31           Semi-active Pulse Radar    82km   Mach 3.5  Fair
     AA-10 Alamo
     MiG-29 or Su-27  Active Doppler Radar       64km   Mach 3+   Good
     AIM-7E Sparrow
     F-4,F-15,F-16    Semi-active Pulse Radar    44km   Mach 3.7  Very Good
     AIM-120A AMRAAM
     any USA          Active Doppler Radar       32km   Mach 4    Very Good
     Short-Range Infrared-Homing
     AA-2 Atoll
     any USSR         IR (first generation)      14km   Mach 2.5  Very Good
     AA-6 Acrid (IR)
     MiG-25           IR (first generation)      50km   Mach 4    Poor
     AA-7 Apex (IR)
     MiG-23           IR (first generation)      34km   Mach 3    Fair
     AA-8 Aphid
     any USSR         IR (second generation)     12km   Mach 3    Excellent
     AA-10 Alamo (IR)
     MiG-29 or Su-27  IR (second generation)     64km   Mach 3+   Good
     AIM-9H Sidewinder
     any Western      IR (first generation)      12km   Mach 3+   Excellent
     AIM-9M Sidewinder
     any USA          IR (second generation)     17km   Mach 3+   Excellent

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Key to Air-to-Air Missiles (AAMs)

        System Name: The name of the missile system.
        Plane: The type of plane which can carry the missile. If a specific
     plane is listed, only those planes can carry that missile. Aircraft
     listed are restricted to those commonly encountered.
        ANY USA means any plane of the US Air Force, but not current or
     former American allies (and therefore not Iran).
        ANY Western means any plane of a western-allied nation, including
     former American allies such as Iran, or neutrals such as Sweden.
        ANY USSR means any plane of a USSR-allied nation, including such
     Soviet allies as Libya, Finland, Iraq, East Germany, Czechoslovakia,
     Poland, etc.
        Guidance System: How the missile finds its target.
        Semi-active Pulse Radar requires that the launching plane continue to
     "paint" the target with radar until the missile hits.
        Active Doppler Radar means the missile has its own radar set,
     allowing the plane to "fire and forget". In addition, the missile's
     doppler radar is only fooled by chaff if the target plane generates a
     small doppler (by running perpendicular to the missile's course).
        IR (First generation) means the missile is a first generation
     infrared homer. It chases the hot engine exhaust only, and is easily
     fooled by jammers and flares.
        IR (second generation) means the missile is a second generation
     infrared homer. It aims at any hot part of a plane, including the nose,
     wings and tail as well as the engine exhausts. It can recover from jamming and
     continue seeking a target.
        Effective Range: The maximum range at which the missile can "lock on"
     to a target.
        Maximum Speed: The launching speed of the missile. Mach 1 is about
     660 knots at sea level.
                                                                     - 132 -
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Surface-to-Air Missiles (SAMs)

     Name             |     Mounting     |  Search Guidance  |
     +----------------+------------------+-------------------+
     | Search |                        | Firing |   Max   |  Max  | Maneuver-
     | Range  |     Firing Guidance    | range  |  Speed  |  Alt  |  ability
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
        Long-Range Radar-Guided SAMs
     SA-2 Guideline     Site               Poor pulse radar
     200 km     beam-rider pulse radar   125 km   Mach 3+   55000'  Very poor
     SA-5 Gammon        Site               Poor pulse radar
     350 km     Beam-rider pulse radar   150 km   Mach 3    95000'  Poor
     SA-10 Grumble      Site or vehicles   Superb dplr radar
     320 km     SA+CG doppler radar      125 km   Mach 3    70000'  Fair
     SA-4 Ganef         Site or vehicles   Poor pulse radar
     100 km     Semi-active pulse radar   70 km   Mach 2.5  75000'  Poor
     SA-12 Gladiator    Vehicles           Good dplr radar
     290 km     SA+CG doppler radar      150 km   Mach 3+   70000'  Fair
     SA-6 Gainful       Vehicles           Poor pulse radar
      80 km     Semi-active pulse radar   30 km   Mach 2.8  60000'  Fair
     SA-8B Gecko        Vehicle            Fair pulse radar
     125km      Semi-active pulse radar   65 km   Mach 2    25000'  Good
     A-11 Gadfly        Vehicle            Fair pulse radar
     200 km     Semi-active pulse radar  100 km   Mach 2.5  45000'  Good
     MIM-23B Hawk       Site               Good dplr radar
     175 km     Semi-active pulse radar  125 km   Mach 1.5  52000'  Good
     Rapier             Site or vehicle    Good pulse radar
      75 km     Semi-active pulse radar   65 km   Mach 2+   24000'  Very Good
     SA-N-4             Warship            Pulse radar
     200 km     Semi-active pulse radar   30 km   Mach 2    25000'  Good
     SA-N-6             Warship            Doppler radar
     320 km     SA+CG doppler radar      125 km   Mach 3    70000'  Fair
     SA-N-7             Warship            Doppler radar
     50-200 km  Semi-active pulse radar  100 km   Mach 2.5  45000'  Good

        Short-Range IR/Visual-Guided SAMs
     SA-7B Grail        Infantry           Eyesight
     Eyesight   IR homing (first gen.)    10 km   Mach 1.5  20000'  Good
     SA-14              Infantry           Eyesight
     Eyesight   IR homing (second gen.)   16 km   Mach 1.5+ 20000'  Excellent
     FIM-43A Redeye     Infantry           Eyesight
     Eyesight   IR homing (first gen.)     7 km   Mach 1.5  10000'  Very Good
     FIM-92A Stinger    Infantry           Eyesight
     Eyesight   IR homing (second gen.)   10 km   Mach 2    20000'  Excellent
     SA-9B Gaskin       Vehicle            Eyesight
     Eyesight   IR homing (first gen.)    30 km   Mach 1.5  20000'  Very Good
     SA-13 Gopher       Vehicle            Poor pulse radar
     125 km     IR homing (second gen.)   65 km   Mach 1.5  30000'  Very good
     Tigercat           Site               Poor pulse radar
      65 km     Visual                    30 km   Mach 1.5  12000'  Good
     SA-N-5             Warship            Poor pulse radar
     50-150 km  IR homing (first gen.)    30 km   Mach 1.5  20000'  Good
     Seacat             Warship            Poor pulse radar
     200 km     Visual                    30 km   Mach 1.5  12000'  Good
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Abbreviations:

     Dplr      Doppler Radar
     gen.      generation
     IR        Infrared
     km        kilometers
     Mach      speed of soundabout 529 to 660 kts, depending on altitude
     SA+CG     Semi-active plus Command Guidance
     Site      Ground site (fixed emplacement)
                                                                     - 133 -
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Key to Surface-to-Air Missiles (SAMs)

        Name: The commonly used name of the system.
        Mounting: How the system operates when seen.
        SITE means fixed missile launchers are positioned around a central
     radar station in a "star" pattern.
        VEHICLES (plural) means the missile launchers and radars are mounted
     on vehicles. The vehicles are usually parked on open ground in an
     irregular pattern. Radars and missile launchers are on seperate vehicles,
     so they remain fairly close together.
        VEHICLE (singular) means each vehicle has both radars and missiles.
     Although a battery usually has 2 to 4 vehicles, often widely dispersed.
        WARSHIP means the radar and missile launcher are mounted on a warship.
        INFANTRY means the missile is man-packed, and therefore carried by
     ground military units, including installation guards, as well as by
     well-equipped terrorists.
        Search Guidance: The type and quality of search radar used by the
     missile. Eyesight is a very poor search method.
        DOPPLER RADAR measures the change in range; it is most effective when
     you fly toward or away from it, least effective when you arc around it
     at a constant distance.
        PULSE RADAR bounces signals off a surface; it is most effective when
     you fly sideways to it, least effective when you fly straight at it.
        Search Range: The theoretical maximum range of the search radar.
     However, against your F-19 radar performance is greatly reduced. The
     quality of the radar and local conditions determine its real, effective
     range.
        Firing Guidance: The way the missile finds your aircraft. Pulse and
     doppler radars have varying effectiveness depending on your flight path
     in relation to the missile (see search guidance, above, for details).
        BEAM-RIDER PULSE RADAR means the missile uses pulse radar guidance,
     with the radar receiver at the launching site. It cannot "burn through"
     jamming at close range.
        SEMI-ACTIVE PULSE RADAR means the missile use pulse radar guidance,
     with the radar receiver in the missile. Therefore it may "burn through"
     jamming at close range.
        SEMI-ACTIVE DOPPLER RADAR means the missile uses doppler radar
     guidance, with the radar receiver in the missile. It too can "burn
     through" jamming at close range.
        SA+CG DOPPLER RADAR means the missile uses doppler radar guidance,
     with the radar receiver in the missile. It can "burn through" jamming at
     close range. In addition it has command guidance that permits multiple
     attacks (should the first attack miss).
        IR homing (first gen.) means the missile uses infrared homing that
     seeks hot exhausts. It is very vulnerable to both jamming and flares.
        IR homing (second gen.) means the missile uses infrared homing that
     seeks any hot surface, including nose, wing edges, tail, etc. It has
     logic circuits that help it recover from jamming or flares.
        VISUAL means the missile is guided by a controller on the ground, who
     must watch your plane and react to your maneuvering.
        Firing Range: Maximum range at which the missile is fired.
        Max Speed: Maximum speed in flight of the missile. Mach 1 is about
     520 to 660 kts.
        Max Alt: Maximum altitude the missile can reach.
        Maneuverability: The turning ability of the missile in flight.
                                                                     - 134 -

                              Air-to-Air Armament:
                              --------------------
     F-19 Weaponry
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     M61A1 20mm "Vulcan"

     very Short range general purpose gun
        Quantity: 1 fixed internally
        Effective Range: 3 km
        Maximum Range: 6 km
        Attack Technique: Tracking camera/laser historical gunsight
        NOTES: This six-barrel gatling-gun type cannon is the standard
     internal armament of most US fighters today, including the F-4, F-14,
     F15, F-16 and F18.
     It can fire 6000 rounds a minute, a high rate of fire that increases the
     chance that a shell will be in the "same piece of sky" as the target
     aircraft. Of course, this rate of fire also means that a wise pilot must
     fire in short bursts (otherwise he'll quickly exhaust all his
     ammunition).

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     AIM-9M "Sidewinder"

     Short range air-to-air missile with infrared homing
        Quantity on rack: 4
        Guidance: Second generation ("all aspect") infrared seeker
        Effective Range: 17 km
        Missile Speed:  Mack 3+
        Missile Maneuverability: Excellent
        Attack Technique: Air-to-Air "fire and forget"
        NOTES: Almost every aspect of this missile has been redesigned and
     upgraded numerous times. The "M" model is the latest, with a greatly
     improved all-aspect seeker head, a new warhead and an improved rocket
     engine. Although an "N" model exists, it represents rebuilds of early
     "B" and "E" models and is less reliable.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     AIM-120A AMRAAM

     Medium range air-to-air missile with active radar homing
        Quntity on rack: 3
        Guidance: Active radar homing (has its own radar in nose)
        Effective Range: 32 km
        Missile Speed: Mach 4
        Missile Maneuverability: Very good
        Attack Technique: Air-to-Air "fire and forget"
        NOTES: This the West's first radar-guided "fire and forget" missile.
     The AMRAAM (advanced medium range air-to-air missile) has its own
     inertial guidance, onboard track-while-scanning radar, and computerized
     target discrimination. Pre-production and early production models are
     becoming available to Stealth units.

                                                                     - 135 -
     ========================================================================
                                 Enemy Cannons:
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     M61A1 20mm "Vulcan"

     Very short range general purpose gun
        Effective Range: 3 km
        Maximum Range: 6 km
        Attack Technique: Radar predicting gunsight
        NOTES: This gun is carried by Iranian F-4 Phantom and F-17 Tomcat
     fighters, which were purchased from the USA in the 1970s (when Iran was
     still an American ally).

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     GSh-23 23mm Cannon

     Very short range general purpose gun
        Effective Range: 3 km
        Maximum Range: 6 km
        Attack Technique: Radar predicting gunsight
        NOTES: This is the standard aerial cannon of USSR-built aircraft. It
     is a twin-barrel design fires about 3000 rds/minute. Range is equivalent
     to the US weapon. The slow rate of fire (compared to the American M61)
     makes it a less effective weapon. A six-barrel version with a rate of
     fire equivalent to the American weapon may arm the MiG-29 and/or Su-27.

     ========================================================================
                                 Enemy IR AAMs:
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     AIM-9H "Sidewinder"

     Short range air-to-air missile with infrared homing
        Effective Range: 12 km
        Missile Speed: Mach 3+
        Missile Maneuverability: Excellent
        Attack Technique: Locks onto tail exhaust, then "fire and forget"
        NOTES: This was the most advanced model Sidewinder sold by America to
     Iran. The missile is solid, reliable and easy to maintain - admirable
     features that unfortunately mean it must be taken seriously by American
     planes flying against Iran.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     AA-2 "Atoll"

     Short range air-to-air missile with infrared homing
        Guidance: First generation infrared seeker
        Missile Speed: 14 km
        Missile Maneuverability: Very good
        Attack Technique: Locks onto tail exhaust, then "fire and forget"
        NOTES: This early 1960s vintage IR missile is now obsolete. However,
     it was produced in vast quantities and sold throughout the world to
     Soviet clients. As a result, it is still carried by aircraft of poorer
     nations, as well as the second-line planes of larger and richer nations.

                                                                     - 136 -
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     AA-6 "Acrid" (IR)

     Medium range air-to-air missile with infrared homing
        Guidance: First generation infrared seeker
        Effective Range: 50 km
        Missile Speed: Mach 4
        Missile Maneuverability: Poor
        Attack Technique: Locks onto tail exhaust, then "fire and foret"
        NOTES: Designed exclusively for the MiG-25 interceptor, this missile
     is an IR version of the powerful AA-6 radar homer (see below).

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     AA-7 "Apex" (IR)

     Medium range air-to-air missile with infrared homing
        Guidance: First generation infrared seeker
        Effective Range: 34 km
        Missile Speed: Mach 3
        Missile Maneuverability: Fair
        Attack technique: Locks onto tail exhaust, then "fire and forget"
        NOTES: This missile is an IR version of the AA-7 radar guided AAM
     (see below). It is most commonly found on MiG-23s.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     AA-8 "Aphid"

     Short range air-to-air missile with infraredhoming
        Guidance: Early second generation infrared seeker
        Effective Range: 12 km
        Missile Speed: Mach 3
        Missile Maneuverability: Excellent
        Attack Technique: All aspect lock on, then "fire and forget"
        NOTES: This small, lightweight missile is a pure dogfighting missile.
     Although its IR seeker may be inferior to the AIM-9M, it is considerably
     superior to earlier Soviet designs. This missile is replacing the now
     obsolete AA-2, and is carried by just about every Soviet-built fighter,
     interceptor and combat helicopter now in service. Soviet clients within
     Europe have the weapon, as do an increasing number of client states and
     customers around the world.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     AA-10 "Alamo" (IR)

     Medium range air-to-air missile with infrared homing
        Guidance: Second generation infrared seeker
        Effective Range: about 64 km
        Missile Speed: Mach 3+
        Missile Maneuverability: Good
        Attack Tachnique: all-aspect lock on, then "fire and forget"
        NOTES: This missile is the IR version of the AA-10. It may be the
     longest-ranged second-generation IR missile in Soviet inventory today.

                                                                     - 137 -
     ========================================================================
                                Enemy Radar AAMs
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     AIM-7E "Sparrow"

     Medium range air-to-air missile with semi-active radar homing
        Guidance: Semi-active radar homing (requires radar guidance from plane)
        Effective Range: 44 km
        Missile Speed: Mach 3.7
        Missile Maneuverability: Very good
        Attack Technique: Semi-active radar guided from launching aircraft
        NOTES: Nicknamed "The Great White Hope" because of its prominent
     exhaust plume, this missile was America's standard radar AAM in the
     1960s and 1970s. The missile is not especially accurate, and depends on
     a close match with the firing aircraft's radar. Both the missile and
     radar demand regular and exacting maintenance. Although Iranian F-4s
     have this weapon, all these drawbacks greatly compromise its
     effectiveness.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     AA-6 "Acrid" (Radar)

     Long range air-to-air missile with semi-active radar homing
        Guidance: Semi-active radar homing (requires radar guidance from plane)
        Effective Range: 50 km
        Missile Speed: Mach 4
        Missile Maneuverability: Poor
        Attack Technique: Semi-active radar guided from launching aircraft
        NOTES: This huge missile is the standard long-range armament of PVO
     MiG-25 interceptors, and is rougly equivalent (though technically
     inferior) to the Phoenix AAM on the F-14. The missile is matched purely
     to the MiG-25; other aircraft cannot control it. MiG-25Rs sold to Soviet
     client states are not normally equipped with this weapon.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     AA-7 "Apex" (Radar)

     Medium range air-to-air missile with semi-active radar homing
        Guidance: Semi-active radar homing (requires radar guidance from plane)
        Effective range: 34 km
        Missile Speed: Mach 3
        Missile Maneuverability: Poor
        Attack Technique: Semi-active radar guided from launching aircraft
        Notes: This was the standard USSR radar homing missile of the 1970s,
     the Russian equivalent of the AIM-7 "Sparrow". It requires a matching
     aircraft radar, found in MiG-23s of the USSR and Warsaw Pact. Many
     MiG-23s sold to smaller Soviet clients outside of Europe had inferior
     radars incapable of controlling this missile.

                                                                     - 138 -
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     AA-9 "Amos"

     Long range air-to-air missile with semi-active radar homing
        Guidance: Semi-active radar homing (requires radar guidance from plane)
        Effective range: 82 km
        Missile Speed: Mach 3.5
        Missile Maneuverability: Fair
        Attack Technique: Semi-active radar guided from launching aircraft
        Notes: This new, large missile is a revision or redesign of the AA-6
     "Acrid" and is designed exclusively for the MiG-31 interceptor. There
     are some reports that the missile is an active radar homer (i.e., has
     its own radar), allowing "fire and forget" launching. There is even
     speculation that the missile could receive mid-course corrections from
     the launching aircraft or a ground radar station, but it is unlikely
     that Russian computer electronics are capable of successfully
     implementing this yet.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     AA-10 "Alamo"

     Medium range air-to-air missile with active radar homing
        Guidance: Active radar homing (has its own radar in nose)
        Effective range: 64 km
        Missile Speed: Mach 3+
        Missile Maneuverability: Good
        Attack Technique: Active radar homing independent of launching aircraft
        Notes: This new, medium-sized radar AAM is strongly believed to be an
     activeradar homer, that is, it carries its own onboard radar for "fire
     and forget" use, like the AIM-120 AMRAAM. It is commonly found on the new
     MiG-29 and Su-27.
                                                                     - 139 -
                            Air-to-Ground Armament:
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     M61A1 20mm Cannon

     The 20mm cannon listed in the air-to-air armament section can be used
     against ground targets as well.

     ========================================================================
                                Guided Missiles
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Penguin-3 ASM

     Medium-altitude infrared-homing anti-ship missile
        Quantity per bay: 2
        Acceptable (grade B) Targets: Ships at sea
        Effective Range: 32 kilometers
        Maximum Speed: Mach 0.8
        Attack Technique: Air-Ground fire-and-forget launch against any
                          warship
        Minimum Launch Altitude: 500'
        Maximum Launch Altitude: 40000'
        Notes: Designed by Norway, this modestly-sized and priced missile is
     aimed at a point on the surface, and flies there under its own inertial
     guidance. At this pre-designated point the missile switches on an
     infrared homer, seeking out the heat of a ship against the cool ocean
     background. The missile is not a sea-skimmer, and is therefore easier to
     shoot down. However, the missile's guidance system are entirely passive
     (unlike the Harpoon, which broadcasts its presence with radar signals).
     Although maximum range in high altitude launch is supposedly 80
     kilometers, the range used here is appropriate to a lower altitude
     attack. Supplies of this weapon are limited because the US government is
     reluctant to purchase weapons from the same source that sold important
     military technology to the USSR in 1981.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     AGM-84A "Harpoon"

     Sea-skimming radar & inertial-guided anti-ship missile
        Quantity per bay: 1
        Optimum (grade A) Targets: Ships at sea
        Effective Range: 60 kilometers
        Maximum Speed: Mach 0.8
        Attack Technique: Air-Ground fire-and-forget launch against any
                          warship
        Minimum Launch Altitude: 500'
        Maximum Launch Altitude: 40000'
        Notes: The Harpoon is the standard anti-ship missile of the American
     Navy and Air Force. This weapon is more powerful, longer ranged and
     harder to stop than the Penguin. It is launched under inertial guidance
     with considerable computer assistance, flying at sea-skimming altitudes
     to avoid detection. At a pre-programmed point it turns on its radar, to
     find and home in on the target. Depending on the terminal guidance
     package installed it will either pop up and dive on the target, or fly
     straight in. Like most anti-shipping missiles, the remaining rocket fuel
     is almost as destructive as the warhead itself.
                                                                     - 140 -
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     AGM-88A HARM

     High speed anti-radiation ("homes on radar") missile
        Quantity per bay: 1
        Optimum (grade A) Targets: Ground radar stations
        Acceptable (grade B) Targets: Warship radars
        Effective Range: 20 kilometers
        Maximum Speed: Mach 2+
        Attack Technique: Air-Ground fire-and-forget launch against any radar
        Minimum Launch Altitude: 500'
        Maximum Launch Altitude: 60000'
        Notes: This is America's most advanced anti-radar missile. It can
     lock and home on hostile radars even if they jump frequencies or switch
     off. The US Defense Department has hinted that it can even home on radar
     set components that are still warm, even if the set itself is turned off!
     The missile also has a "loiter" mode where it is fired blind and circles,
     waiting for a hostile radar to appear so it can attack it. The "loiter"
     attack mode is not available to HARMs carried on the F-19.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     AGM-65D "Maverick"

     Thermal-imaging air-to-ground guided missile
        Quantity per bay: 2
        Acceptable (grade B) Targets: Bridges, bunkers, radar sites, oil
                                      facilities, ships
        Poor (grade C) Targets: Airbase hangars, ground planes, buildings,
                                depots, missile sites
        Effective Range: 32 kilometers
        Maximum Speed: Mach 1+
        Attack Technique: Air-Ground fire-and-forget launch
        Minimum Launch Altitude: 500'
        Maximum Launch Altitude: 40000'
        Notes: The Maverick is America's standard air-to-ground guided
     missile, and has a wide variety of guidance systems. The original design
     put a simple video camera in the missile's nose. While the missile
     remained attached to the plane the pilot used a miniature stick and
     screen to aim the bomb at the target below, locked it in, and released
     the weapon. Once in flight the bomb steered toward the image locked into
     its computer brain. Later versions added zoom-lenses, PAVE TACK lasers,
     and ultimately, in the "D" model, a FLIR (forward-looking infrared)
     thermal imaging system that can "see" through clouds, smoke, and night.
     The missile usually carries a shaped-charge warhead for maximum effect
     against hardened targets impervious to normal bombing attacks. However,
     high explosive warheads can be fitted instead for maximum destructive
     effect against unarmored targets.
                                                                     - 141 -
     ========================================================================
                              Laser-Guided Bombs:
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     GBU-12 Paveway

     Laser-guided glide bomb
        Quantity per bay: 2
        Acceptable (grade B) Targets: Hangars, buildings, bridges, bunkers,
                                      depots, missile sites, radar sites,
                                      oil facilities
        Poor (grade C) Targets: Ships
        Effective Range: 2 kilometers per 1K' of altitude
        Maximum Speed: Glide bomb
        Attack Technique: Toss bombing or level bombing
        Toss Bombing Attack Altitude: 500' and climb
        Level Bombing Attack Altitude: 2000' and turn away
        Notes: The GBU-12 is one of the standard laser-guided bombs in the US
     armory. Large fighter-bombers like the F-111 favor heavier 1000lb and
     2000lb models, but the F-19 must carry lighter weight munitions in its
     small bays. The Pave Tack guidance system is the most accurate way of
     placing a bomb on a target (short of using a guided missile like the
     Maverick). The advantage of using a bomb is that the weapon weight is
     almost entirely explosive, while guided missiles must, of necessity, use
     some of their weight for the rocket motor.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     CBU-72 FAE

     Laser-guided triple fuel-air explosive ("overpressure") bomb
        Quantity per bay: 2
        Optimum (grade A) Targets: Buildings
        Acceptable (grade B) Targets: Submarine pens, hangars, bunkers, oil
                                      platforms
        Poor (grade C) Targets: Ships
        Effective Range: 2 kilometers per 1K' of altitude
        Maximum Speed: Glide bomb
        Attack Technique: Toss bombing or level bombing
        Toss Bombing Attack Altitude: 500' and climb
        Level Bombing Attack Altitude: 2000' and turn away
        Notes: This weapon contains a mixture of three heavier-than-air gases.
     When the bomb lands, the gases are released into the air, forming an
     explosive mixture. A delayed-action fuse ignites the mixture, which
     causes the contaminated air to burn. As well as incinerating everything,
     the burning gas expands instantly. In the open air this is sufficient to
     set off mines and flatten soft objects (such as men). However, in an
     enclosed space the effect is vastly magnified, with the walls, floor and
     roof of the structure broken and blown apart. The result in underground
     structures, like submarine pens, is total destruction.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Mk 20 "Rockeye" II

     Laser-guided high-explosive cluster bomb
        Quantity per bay: 2
        Acceptable (grade B) Targets: Grounded planes, buildings, depots,
                                      missile
                                                                     - 142 -
                                      sites, radar sites, oil
                                      facilities, ships
        Effective Range: 2 kilometers per 1K' of altitude
        Maximum Speed: Glide bomb
        Attack Technique: Toss bombing or level bombing
        Toss Bombing Attack Altitude: 500' and climb
        Level Bombing Attack Altitude: 2000' and turn away
        Notes: This weapon marries a laser-guided glide-bomb system with a
     Mk 20 Rockeye cluster munition (see below). The laser guidance allows
     for earlier release and greater bomblet release accuracy. With an area
     weapon like a cluster bomb the former is more important, since it gives
     an increased safety margin to the launching aircraft.

     ========================================================================
                                Retarded Bombs:
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Mk 20 "Rockeye"

     Retarded fragmentation cluster bomb
        Quantity per bay: 2
        Acceptable (grade B) Targets: Grounded planes, buildings, depots,
                                      missile sites, radar sites, oil
                                      facilities
        Poor (grade C) Targets: Ships
        Effective Range: Nil
        Maximum Speed: Retarded bomb
        Attack Technique: Low-altitude level bombing
        Level Bombing Attack Altitude: 500'
        Notes: This cluster bomb breaks open about 100' above the surface,
     spinning out 247 shaped-charge bomblets that can destroy buildings,
     armored vehicles, and people. The opening height and pattern can be
     pre-set for various types of targets. The U.S. Navy discovered these
     bombs were effective against small warships when a single cluster bomb
     wrecked a Libyan Nanuchka-class missile boat in 1986. Of course, not all
     warships are as vulnerable.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Durandal Bomb

     Parachute-deployed runway-penetration bomb
        Quantity per bay: 2
        Optimum (grade A) Targets: Runways
        Poor (grade C) Targets: Bridges
        Effective Range: Nil
        Maximum Speed: Retarded bomb
        Attack Technique: Low-altitude level bombing
        Level Bombing Attack Altitude: 500'
        Notes: This is the standard anti-runway weapon in the USAF arsenal,
     even though it's French made. When the Durandal is released over target
     it deploys a parachute. This causes it to float nose-down and roughly
     stationary over the runway surface. Then its rocket motor ignites,
     blasting the warhead straight down through the concrete, where a delayed
     action fuse explodes it. This heaves up large sections of runway surface,
     while smaller shards fly hundreds
                                                                     - 143 -
     of feet through the air. The result is
     a thoroughly ruined surface and tons of wreckage that requires both
     heavy equipment and considerable time to repair.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     ISC B-1 Minelets

     Parachute-deployed minelet dispenser
        Quantity per bay: 1
        Optimum (Grade A) Targets: Runways
        Poor (Grade C) Targets: Buildings, depots, missile sites, oil
                                facilities on land
        Effective Range: Nil
        Maximum Speed: Retarded bomb
        Attack Technique: Low altitude level bombing
        Level bombing attack altitude: 500'
        Notes: This new weapon breaks open at altitude and dispenses a
     variety of small anti-personnel, anti-vehicle and delayed fuse mines.
     Used on airfields they prevent flight operations until cleared. They can
     also cause problems around open-air structures such as refineries, oil
     wells etc. Clearing the mines is complicated by the variety of types, as
     well as random delayed-fuse bombs (i.e., you'll never know when another
     will explode!).

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Mk 82-1 "Snakeye"

     Retarded high-explosive ("iron") bomb
        Quantity per bay: 3
        Acceptable (Grade B) Targets: Grounded planes, buildings, depots, oil
                                      facilities on land
        Poor (Grade C) Targets: Radar sites
        Effective Range: Nil
        Maximum Speed: Retarded bomb
        Attack Technique: Low altitude level bombing
        Level bombing attack altitude: 500'
        Notes: Retarded bombs use parachutes ar vanes to slow their descent,
     allowing the plane to clear the area before they land and explode. As a
     result they can be dropped from a lower altitude than free-fall bombs.
     However, they are less accurate, making them unsuitable against small
     targets. For the most accurate release, retarded bombs should be dropped
     in level flight. The Snakeye is the standard vane-type retarder unit for
     many US bombs, here attached to the Mk 82 500 lb. high-explosive bomb.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Mk 35 IN Cluster

     Retarded incendiary cluster bomb
        Quantity per bay: 2
        Optimum (Grade A) Targets: Grounded planes, depots, missile sites,
                                   oil facilities
        Acceptable (Grade B) Targets: Buildings
        Poor (Grade C) Targets: Radar sites, ships
        Effective Range: Nil
        Maximum Speed: Retarded bomb
        Attack Technique: Low-altitude level bombing
        Level bombing attack altitude: 500'
                                                                     - 144 -
        Notes: This cluster bomb is similar to the Rockeye, but filled with
     57 incendiary bomblets. The cluster breaks apart in mid-air, spreading
     the bomblets over an area of several hundred yards. Then each bomblet
     spreads a burning liquid wherever it lands. The result is a raging fire
     that completely covers a wide area.

     ========================================================================
                                Free-Fall Bombs
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     MK 82-0 "Slick"

     Free fall high explosive ("iron") bomb
        Quantity per bay: 3
        Acceptable (Grade B) Targets: Buildings, depots, oil facilities on
                                      land
        Poor (Grade C) Targets: Hangars, grounded planes, missile sites,
                                radar sites, oil platforms, ships
        Effective Range: Nil
        Maximum Speed: Free-fall bomb
        Attack Technique: Level bombing or dive bombing
        Level bombing attack altitude: 3000'
        Dive bombing attack altitude: Dive from 8000', release at 3000'
        Notes: This weapon is the traditional 500 lb high explosive bomb,
     virtually unchanged in concept since WWII. The effectiveness of this bomb
     depends almost entirely on the skill of the bomber. The most important
     consideration when using "iron" bombs is that releases below 2000' don't
     give the bomb time to arm in flight, causing "dud" hits. This occurred in
     the Falklands war of 1982, when Argentine pilots repeatedly hit British
     ships with bombs dropped from 50' to 100'. Not one bomb exploded.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     MK 122 "Fireye"

     Free fall incendiary ("fire") bomb
        Quantity per bay: 2
        Acceptable (Grade B) Targets: Grounded planes, buildings, depots, oil
                                      facilities on land
        Poor (Grade C) Targets: Hangars, bunkers, missile sites, radar sites,
                                oil platforms, ships
        Effective Range: Nil
        Maximum Speed: Free-fall bomb
        Attack Technique: Level bombing or dive bombing
        Level bombing attack altitude: 3000'
        Dive bombing attack altitude: Dive from 8000', release at 3000'
        Notes: This weapon contains an incendiary gel that spreads a burning
     liquid over a wide area. The liquid can flow into vents, grates, weapon
     slits, etc., making it effective against vehicles and fortifications as
     well as open-air targets. Of course, the bomb must be placed on the
     target with some accuracy to achieve this effect. Bombing skill is
     extremely important with this weapon.
                                                                     - 145 -
     ========================================================================
                                Other Equipment
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     135mm/IR Camera

     Visual and Infrared photographic reconnaissance camera
        Quantity per bay: 1
        Targets: Any
        Effective Range: Not Applicable
        Maximum Speed: Not Applicable
        Attack Technique: Level low-altitude photographic run
        Photo run altitude: 200'
        Notes: This pallet contains a 135mm high resolution camera for use in
     visible light and, and a second camera for infrared (IR) thermal
     photography. Both photographs are taken simultaneously under pilot
     control. When this camera is deployed through the bomb bay, the F-19's
     tracking camera is "frozen" into a pre-programmed position, allowing it
     to function as a viewer for the big 135mm lens.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     1900 lbs Fuel

     Additional fuel for extended range flying
        Quantity per bay: 1
        Targets: Not Applicable
        Effective Range: Improves flight range by 19% per tank
        Maximum Speed: Not Applicable
        Attack Technique: Not Applicable
        Altitude: No effect
        Notes: This fuel container gives extra range with the minimum
     container weight. It replaces the weapons mounting in one bay. The fuel
     can be transferred into the main tanks by the flip of a switch. The F-19
     turbofan engine fuel lines run only to the main tanks; the engines
     cannot be fed directly from extra tanks.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Special Equipment

     The data below refers to airdropping secret equipment
        Quantity per bay: 1
        Targets: Not Applicable
        Effective Range: Not Applicable
        Maximum Speed: Not Applicable
        Attack Technique: Airdrop from level flight or land at airstrip
        Airdrop altitude: 500' to 1000'
        Notes: Airdropped equipment in the F-19 uses a simple ripcord-and-
     chute design. When the equipment package is released from the weapons
     bay, a long ripcord remains attached. Within a second the cord draws
     taut and pulls open the chute.
                                                                     - 146 -

                         Surface-to-Air Missile Systems
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     SAM Technical Specifications

        Radar Ratings: Pulse radars are generally less effective than doppler
     radars. Obsolescent radars of either type are greatly inferior to modern
     radars. As a result, modern doppler radars are the most dangerous, while
     obsolescent pulse radars are the least dangerous.
        RANGES are given in kilometers. Note that a maximum firing range is
     often less than the maximum search range, due to the limited fuel
     carried by most missiles.
        Guidance Systems: RADAR GUIDED missiles, with or without command
     guidance, are confused by your ECM jammer unless they are very close.
     If they are close, chaff is needed instead. INFRARED GUIDED missiles are
     confused by your IR jammer unless very close, where flares are used
     instead. A decoy is effective against any type of missile.
        VISUALLY GUIDED missiles cannot be fooled, but are usually slow
     reacting, allowing you to outmaneuver them fairly easily.
        MAXIMUM SPEED is a useful measure of whether you can outrun a missile,
     and how much reaction time you have if one is fired. Mach 1 or 2 missiles
     are fairly slow and easier to deal with. Mach 3 or faster missiles are
     much more formidable opponents.
        MAXIMUM ALTITUDE is also a useful measure, since in some cases you
     can fly above the missile's ceiling.
        MANEUVERABILITY indicates how easy it is to outmaneuver the missile.
     The less maneuverable the missile, the better your chance of turning
     perpendicular to its course and outmaneuvering it.

     ========================================================================
     Radar-Controlled SAMs

        The standard long-range SAM is controlled by radar. First the search
     radar scans the sky to find your plane. Search radars are graphically
     portrayed in the preflight briefing, and on your cockpit CRT maps.
        When the search system finds your plane, it will "hand off" the
     prospective target to a narrow-beam fire control radar, usually running
     on a different frequency. The "TRAK" warning light in the cockpit alerts
     you whenever a narrow-beam tracking radar "paints" your craft. Tracking
     continues while the missile is airborne.
        BEAM RIDER radar-guided missiles are the least flexible. They "ride"
     the controlling radar's beam. They can be easily jammed, have poor
     maneuverability, and cannot "turn around" for a second attack if they
     miss.
        SEMI-ACTIVE radarguided missiles are more flexible. They can "burn
     through" jamming as they approach the target, and often have better
     maneuverability. However, like beam riders, they cannot "turn around"
     for a second attack
                                                                     - 147 -
     if they miss.
        COMMAND GUIDANCE radar-guided missiles are the most flexible. Like
     semi-active missiles, they can burn through jamming at short distances
     and have good maneuverability. In addition, they can be commanded to
     turn around and try again if they miss on the first pass.
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     SA-2 Guideline

     Long-range fixed-site radar-homing SAM.
        Battery configuration: Radar bunker with missile emplacements
        Search System: Obsolescent pulse radar
        Maximum Search Range: 200 kilometers
        Guidance System: Obsolescent pulse radar "beam-rider"
        Maximum Firing Range: 125 kilometers
        Maximum Speed: Mach 3+
        Maximum Altitude: 55000'
        Maneuverability: Very poor
        NOTES: This very old system is used by many third world nations
     outfitted with Soviet equipment. Although the radar systems have been
     upgraded over the last two decades, they are still inferior to modern
     systems. The last time SA-2s were used effectively was in the air
     defense of North Vietnam in the early 70s. Today it is almost worthless.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     SA-5 Gammon

     Long-range fixed-site radar-homing SAM.
        Battery configuration: Radar bunker with missile emplacements
        Search System: Obsolescent pulse radar
        Maximum Search Range: 350 kilometers
        Guidance System: Obsolescent pulse radar "beam-rider"
        Maximum Speed: Mach 3
        Maximum Firing Range: 150 kilometers
        Maximum Altitude: 95000'
        Maneuverability: Poor
        NOTES: The SA-5 is the largest and longest ranged SAM in the world
     today. However, bigger is not always better. Missile accuracy at extreme
     ranges is poor, its radar control system mediocre, and the huge missile
     has very poor maneuverability. Still, the extreme range poses a
     formidable threat. In its 1986 exchanges with Libya, the US Navy's first
     priority was disabling the SA-5 Gammon batteries with HARM missiles.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     SA-10 Grumble

     Long-range fixed-site or vehicular radar-homing SAM.
        Battery configuration: Radar bunker or armored vehicle with missile
                               emplacements or armored vehicle missile
                               launchers.
        Search System: Phased-array doppler radar
        Maximum Search Range: 320 kilometers
        Guidance System: Modern doppler radar and command guidance
        Maximum Speed: Mach 3
        Maximum Firing Range: 125 kilometers
                                                                     - 148 -
        Maximum Altitude: Over 70000'
        Maneuverability: Fair
        NOTES: This semi-mobile all-altitude defense system was originally
     designed to defend the borders of the USSR from both cruise missiles and
     aircraft. However, recent failures to detect and engage low-flying
     aircraft suggest this system is less than perfect. The SA-10 is a "new
     generation" long range air defense weapon designed to replace the
     obsolescent SA-5 Gammon. Because this weapon is new, details may be
     innaccurate.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     SA-4 Ganef

     Medium-range fixed-site or vehicular radar-homing SAM.
        Battery configuration: Radar bunker with missile emplacements, or
                               radar and launcher on tracked vehicles.
        Search System: Obsolescent pulse radar
        Maximum Search Range: 100 kilometers
        Guidance System: Obsolescent pulse radar & semi-active radar homing
        Maximum Firing Range: 70 kilometers
        Maximum Speed: Mach 2.5
        Maximum Altitude: 75000'
        Maneuverability: Very poor
        NOTES: The SA-4 was Russia's first mobile, battlefield SAM, designed
     to accompany large military formations as they maneuver on the
     battlefield. It operates in the rear areas of the front lines, attacking
     aircraft that IR SAMs fail to hit. The SA-4 entered service in the 1960s.
     It is now obsolescent, found only in 2nd and 3rd line Russian units. It
     has been sold extensively to Russian allies and client states.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     SA-12 Gladiator

     Medium/long-range site or vehicular radar-homing SAM.
        Battery configuration: Temporary site with radar and missile
                               launchers, or dispersed radar and launcher
                               vehicles.
        Search System: Phased-array doppler radar
        Maximum Search Range: 290 kilometers
        Guidance System: Modern doppler radar and command guidance
        Maximum Speed: Mach 3+
        Maximum Firing Range: 150 kilometers
        Maximum Altitude: Over 70000'
        Maneuverability: Fair
        NOTES: This very new system is believed to be a semi-mobile SAM
     designed to accompany armies, deploying far to the rear. From that
     position the missile can provide a wide umbrella of defense against both
     air raids and missile attacks. Because this weapon is quite new, the
     details may be innaccurate.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     SA-6 Gainful

     Medium-range vehicular radar-homing SAM.
        Battery configuration: Radar and launcher on tracked vehicles.
        Search System: Obsolescent pulse radar
        Maximum Search Range: 80 kilometers
                                                                     - 149 -
        Guidance System: Obsolescent pulse radar and command guidance
        Maximum Firing Range: 30 kilometers
        Maximum Speed: Mach 2.8
        Maximum Altitude: 60000'
        Maneuverability: Fair
        NOTES: This medium range battlefield SAM is also obsolescent in the
     Russian army, but extensively used by the first-line forces of Soviet
     allies and client states. It is designed to accompany combat troops,
     protecting them from positions only a short distance behind the front
     lines. The missile was very effective in the first few days of the 1973
     Arab-Israeli War, but soon succumbed to advanced ECM jammers.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     SA-8 Gecko

        Medium-range vehicular radar-homing SAM.
        Battery configuration: Radar and launcher on a single vehicle
        Search System: Modern pulse radar
        Maximum Search Range: 125 kilometers
        Guidance System: Modern pulse radar, semi-active with video backup
        Maximum Speed: Mach 2
        Maximum Firing Range: 65 kilometers
        Maximum Altitude: 25000'
        Maneuverability: Good
        NOTES: This shorter-ranged but higher quality successor to the SA-6
     was the standard "up front" radar SAM of the Soviet Army in the 1970s
     and early 1980s. Now being replaced by the SA-11, it is likely to appear
     among the armies of Russia's allies and client states soon.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     SA-11 Gadfly

     Medium-range vehicular radar-homing SAM.
        Battery configuration: Radar and launcher on a single vehicle
        Search System: Modern doppler radar
        Maximum Search Range: 200 kilometers
        Guidance System: Modern pulse radar, backup unknown
        Maximum Speed: Mach 2.5
        Maximum Firing Range: 100 kilometers
        Maximum Altitude: 45000'
        Maneuverability: Good
        NOTES: This weapon is the "next generation" battlefield radar SAM
     designed to replace the SA-6 and SA-8. The weapon is very new, and
     details may well be inaccurate.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     MIM-23B Hawk

     Medium-range fixed-site radar-homing SAM.
        Battery configuration: Radar bunker or trailer with missile launcher
                               emplacements or trailers
        Search System: Moder pulse radar
        Maximum Search Range: 175 kilometers
        Guidance System: Modern pulse radar & command guidance
                                                                     - 150 -
        Maximum Speed: Mach 1.5
        Maximum Firing Range: 125 kilometers
        Maximum Altitude: 52000'
        Maneuverability: Good
        NOTES: The HAWK has long been the standard SAM of the USA, with
     various models exported to allies, including Iran. Lt.Colonel North's
     famous arms deal to Iran included extra parts and missiles for HAWK
     batteries, then Iran's most powerful air defense system. This missile
     was adequate for the 1970s, but is no longer "state of the art" against
     first-line 1980s aircraft. The US Army's replacement, the MIM-104
     "Patriot" has not been sold to any other nation.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Rapier

     Short-range fixed-site visual/radar-homing SAM.
        Battery configuration: Combined radar and launcher pedestal, or on
                               tracked vehicle.
        Search System: Modern pulse radar
        Maximum Search Range: 75 km
        Guidance System: Optical command guidance with semi-active pulse
                         radar backup
        Maximum Speed: Mach 2+
        Maximum Firing Range: 65 km
        Maximum Altitude: 24000'
        Maneuverability: Very good
        NOTES: This is a British high-precision, high-speed SAM for general
     battlefield defense (roughly equivalent to the SA-8). However it is
     greatly hampered by its short range, and was not very effective in the
     Falklands for this reason. Fixed pedestal versions were sold to the
     Iranian air force for airbase defense.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     SA-N-4

     Medium-range area-defense naval SAM.
        Battery configuration: Integral to warship
        Search System: depends on the ship, usually some type of pulse radar
        Maximum Search Range: Depends on the ship. Typically 100-200 km
        Guidance System: Modern pulse radar with video backup
        Maximum Speed: Mach 2
        Maximum Firing Range: 30 kilometers
        Maximum Altitude: 25000'
        Maneuverability: Good
        NOTES: This missile is the naval version of the SA-8 Gecko, used on
     some cruisers, frigates, newer missile boats (including the Nanuchka
     class), and amphibious warfare ships. The twin missile launcher pops up
     from an armored silo when ready to fire. The missiles can be fired
     against surface ships as well as airplanes, but are ineffective against
     modern anti-ship cruise missiles. This is a serious drawback, since many
     cruisers have a longer range than this SAM.
                                                                     - 151 -
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     SA-N-6

     Medium-range area-defense naval SAM.
        Battery configuration: Integral to warship
        Search System: Phased array doppler radar
        Maximum Search Range: 300+ kilometers
        Guidance System: Modern doppler radar and command guidance
        Maximum Speed: Mach 3
        Maximum Firing Range: 125 kilometers
        Maximum Altitude: over 70000'
        Maneuverability: Average
        Notes: This is the naval version of the SA-10 Grumble long-range
     air-defense SAM, mounted on the Kiev-class aircraft carriers and
     Kirov-class battlecruisers. It is an excellent all-altitude weapon
     capable of reaching out long distances to intercept incoming airstrikes
     before they launch their own missiles, as well as planes that approach
     more closely. It is also designed to shoot down incoming cruise
     missiles, should a hostile aircraft manage to launch one.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     SA-N-7

     Medium-range area-defense naval SAM.
        Battery configuration: Integral to warship
        Search System: depends on ship, usually modern doppler radar
        Maximum Search Range: depends on the ship, 50-200 kilometers
        Guidance System: Modern pulse radar, backup unknown
        Maximum Speed: Mach 2.5
        Maximum Firing Range: 100 kilometers
        Maximum Altitude: 45000'
        Maneuverability: Good
        NOTES: This is the naval equivalent of the SA-11 Gadfly, found on
     Sovremennyy-class and later destroyers. It is a good self-defense weapon
     against air attacks that fly near or over the ship, but lacks the range
     to engage distant planes launching anti-ship cruise missiles. This
     missile is not good enough to shoot down anti-ship cruise missiles, but
     the Sovremennyys carry 30mm gatling guns for that job.

     ========================================================================
                          Short Range IR & Visual SAMs
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
        Expensive, sophisticated short range SAMs rely on search radars, but
     the less expensive designs use simple eyesight. Once acquired, the
     target may be tracked by eyesight, cameras, or radar.
        If the missile is an IR homer, it is aimed along the tracking line,
     and its infrared seeker turned on. When the seeker locks onto the target
     the missile is launched. From that point onward the missile steers
     itself, using its seeker.
        Infrared seekers home on heat sources. "First generation" seekers
     were easily confused by the sun, common distress flares, even
     greenhouses or sun-heated rocks. More modern "second generation" seekers
     have filters, improved technology and computer logic, making them more
     difficult to "fool" with jammers or flares.
                                                                     - 152 -
        Visually guided weapons require that the controller guide the missile
     to the target in sight. Early designs (such as the Tigercat and Seacat)
     required the controller to actually fly the missile like a plane, later
     designs (such as the Rapier) require that the controller just keep the
     target in his crosshairs - the missile automatically guides itself in
     whatever direction the crosshair sight indicates, Visually guided
     systems cannot be jammed, have trouble tracking wildly maneuvering
     targets, or even finding a target in bad visibility.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     SA-7B Grail

     Short-range shoulder-launched infrared-homing SAM.
        Battery configuration: Carried by infantrymen, or in any light
                               vehicle.
        Search System: Eyesight
        Maximum Search Range: Eyesight
        Guidance System: Infrared homing (first generation)
        Maximum Speed: Mach 1.5
        Maximum Firing Range: 10 kilometers
        Maximum Altitude: 20000'+
        Maneuverability: Good
        NOTES: One of the first shoulder fired SAMs, this missile has good
        speed and range but a very weak warhead. The IR seeker has been
        improved in the B model, but even more upgrades appeared in the
        SA-14 (see below).

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     FIM-43A Redeye

     Short-range shoulder-launched infrared-homing SAM.
        Battery configuration: Carried by infantrymen, or in any light
                               vehicle.
        Search System: Eyesight
        Maximum Search Range: Eyesight
        Guidance System: Infrared homing (first generation)
        Maximum Speed: Mach 1.5
        Maximum Firing Range: No more that 7 kilometers
        Maximum Altitude: 10000'+
        Maneuverability: Very good
        NOTES: This was America's first shoulder-fired SAM, and was never
     really very effective. Its IR seeker was very simple, the warhead small,
     and the range and speed barely adequate. However, during the 1970s the
     US Army had nothing better, and a few NATO allies were loyal enough to
     buy it.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     SA-14 & SA-16

     Short-range shoulder-launched infrared-homing SAM.
        Battery configuration: Carried by infantrymen, or in any light
                               vehicle.
        Search System: Eyesight
        Maximum Search Range: Eyesight
        Guidance System: Infrared homing (second generation all-aspect)
        Maximum Speed: Mach 1.5+
        Maximum Firing Range: About 16 kilometers
        Maximum Altitude: 20000'+
        Maneuverability: Excellent
        NOTES: This is a completely upgraded version of the SA-7, with greater

                                                                     - 153 -
     speed, range, and a much improved IR seeker. Even further improvements
     and refinements will appear with the upcoming SA-16.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     FIM-92A Stinger

     Short-range shoulder-launched infrared-homing SAM.
        Battery Configuration: Carried by infantrymen, or in any light
                               vehicle.
        Search System: Eyesight
        Maximum Search Range: Eyesight
        Guidance System: Infrared homing (second generation all-aspect)
        Maximum Speed: Mach 2
        Maximum Firing Range: about 10 kilometers
        Maximum Altitude: about 20000'
        Maneuverability: Excellent
        NOTES: Entering production in 1981, this was a much-needed
     replacement for the Redeye. The Stinger is much more effective missile,
     largely because of its excellent and quite "intelligent" IR seeker. The
     CIA has been supplying quantities of this missile to guerilla movements,
     who in turn have traded or given this weapon to groups hostile to
     America, including the Iranian Shi'ite militia.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     SA-9B Gaskin

     Short-range vehicle mounted infrared-homing SAM.
        Battery Configuration: Radar and launcher on same armored vehicle
        Search System: Eyesight
        Maximum Search Range: Eyesight
        Guidance System: Pulse radar aiming and infrared (IR) homing
        Maximum Speed: Mach 1.5
        Maximum Firing Range: 30 kilometers
        Maximum Altitude: 20000'
        Maneuverability: Very good
        NOTES: This is an upgraded version of the SA-9 missile vehicle. The
     original design did very poorly in the Bekaa Valley against Israeli
     aircraft in 1981. The SA-9 is designed to accompany front-line combat
     units and provide low-level defense against strike aircraft and
     helicopters. The missile itself is fairly small and not especially
     destructive.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     SA-13 Gopher

     Short-range vehicle mounted infrared-homing SAM.
        Battery Configuration: Radar and launcher on same armored vehicle
        Search System: Obsolescent pulse radars or eyesight
        Maximum Search Range: visual or 30-60 kilometer pulse radar
        Guidance System: Pulse radar aiming and infrared (IR) homing
        Maximum Speed: Mach 1.5
        Maximum Firing Range: 65 kilometers
        Maximum Altitude: 30000'
        Maneuverability: Very good
        NOTES: This is an improved SA-9 with a new launcher, better radar,
     and an improved missile. Unlike the SA-9, it can be linked with a
     seperate search
                                                                     - 154 -
     radar system, including other obsolescent systems from older radar-
     guided SAMs. A number of third world nations have received this with the
     SA-9B missiles on the new tracked launcher.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Tigercat

     Short-range fixed site visual SAM.
        Battery Configuration: Emplacements with controller position, trailer
                               laucher(s).
        Search System: Visual or obsolescent pulse radar
        Maximum Search Range: Eyesight or 65 kilometer pulse radar
        Guidance System: Joystick (visual) command guidance
        Maximum Speed: Mach 1.5
        Maximum Firing Range: 30 kilometers
        Maximum Altitude: 12000'
        Maneuverability: Good
        NOTES: This inexpensive land version of the Seacat missile is only
     useful for protecting installations from direct air raids. It is very
     short ranged, cannot reach high altitudes, and has a primitive "operator
     must fly the missile" control system. Missiles are heavy, and mounted on
     trailers that must be deployed well to the rear of any battlefield
     frontline. It's hard to take this missile seriously.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     SA-N-5

     Short-range point defense naval SAM.
        Battery Configuration: Integral to warship
        Search System: Naval pulse radar of varying quality
        Maximum Search Range: Varies with ship, 50-150 kilometers
        Guidance System: Infrared (IR) homing
        Maximum Speed: Mach 1.5
        Maximum Firing Range: 30 kilometers
        Maximum Altitude: 20000'
        Maneuverability: Very good
        NOTES: This is the naval version of the SA-7 Grail. Older frigates
     and missile boats (including the very common Osa class) use this system.
     The missiles are aimed visually, their IR locked on, and then fired.
     Larger launcher systems have four launching tubes and an operator
     position. The system is effective only against aircraft that fly close
     to the boat or ship.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Seacat

     Short-range point defense naval SAM.
        Battery Configuration: Integral to warship
        Search System: Obsolescent pulse radar (on Vosper Mk 5 Frigates)
        Maximum Search Range: 200 kilometers (on Vosper Mk 5 Frigates)
        Guidance System: Joystick (visual) command guidance
        Maximum Speed: Mach 1.5
        Maximum Firing Range: 30 kilometers
        Maximum Altitude: 12000'
        Maneuverability: Good
                                                                     - 155 -
        NOTES: The Seacat missile is the naval version of the Tigercat, with
     the same primitive control system and short range. It is the anti-
     aircraft defense of Mark 5 frigates, built by Vosper in England for
     export. Iran bought a number of these ships. The Vosper's search radar
     is the obsolescent AWS-1, whose maximum range is 200 kilometers. Its
     effective range against a stealth aircraft would be much, much less.

                                                                     - 156 -
                                   Warplanes
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Key to Aircraft
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Roles

        A FIGHTER plane specializes in air-to-air combat, where the objective
     is destroying enemy aircraft.
        An INTERCEPTOR is a fighter designed to fly long distances and attack
     distant enemy aircraft. Many interceptors are poor dogfighters.
        A STRIKE plane is designed to hit surface targets in enemy territory.
     CLOSE SUPPORT strikes are against enemy front-line troops, INTERDICTION
     strikes are against military rear areas (headquarters, supply dumps,
     columns on roads, etc.), while DEEP STRIKES attack enemy installations
     far behind the front line (railroad yards, bridges, airbases, etc.).
     Strike aircraft designed to function against warships are sometimes
     termed ATTACK aircraft.
        BOMBERS are designed for interdiction, deep strike, and/or naval
     attack, as well as carrying nuclear weapons and/or reconnaissance gear.
        TRANSPORTS carry personnel and equipment. They are not designed to
     fight, and almost never carry any armament.
        AEW&C (Airborne Early Warning & Control) planes carry powerful search
     radar and communications gear, designed to watch friendly and hostile
     aircraft while simultaneously controlling friendly air operations.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Crew

        If a plane has a crew of one man, cockpit aids are important: the
     workload for one man in a jet warplane is quite high.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Mission Weight

        This is the typical total weight of the plane, with fuel and weapons,
     at takeoff. If the plane can serve in both fighter and strike role, the
     fighter (air-to-air) weight is given. In a strike role a plane often
     carries 15-35% additional weight.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Engines

        The total thrust of the engines (on afterburners if available) is
     important. Airplanes with greater thrust than weight can fly
     "ballistically", a useful advantage in air combat. A high thrust/weight
     ratio is desired by all fighter pilots.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Range

        This is the combat radius of the plane when loaded for action, but
     using only internal tanks (no extra fuel tanks). Often the figure is an
     approximation.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Ceiling

      Maximum altitude of the plane, using afterburners if available.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Maximum Speed at 0'

        Sea-level maximum speed is often much less than high altitude maximum
     speed, especially in high-speed jets.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Maximum Speed at 36,000'

        This altitude level is an important benchmark because above it Mach 1
     is a constant 573 knots. Although this speed is important, note that the
     optimum
                                                                     - 157 -
     turning speed for most aircraft is Mach 0.75 to 0.90 (i.e., 550-650
     knots, depending on the plane and altitude); higher speeds are only good
     for chasing opponents, escaping from them, or quick dashes into and out
     of enemy airspace.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Armament

        Often weapons pylons can be fitted to carry multiple bombs or
     lightweight missiles. The number of pylons need not limit the number of
     ordnance items.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Air-to-Air Radar Quality

        As a stealth pilot, you are naturally interested in the range and
     quality of enemy airborne search radar.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Maneuverability

        This is a comparative rating of how well the plane can maneuver in a
     dogfight. All aircraft are rated on the same standard: the superb
     maneuverability of the F-16 Falcon.

     ========================================================================
                            American-Built Warplanes
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     F-4E Phantom II
        Designer/Manafacturer: McDonnell Douglas, USA
        Role: Fighter & strike fighter
        Crew: Two
        Mission Weight at Takeoff: 27 tons
        Engine(s): Two General Electric J79-17 turbojets for 35,800 lbs
                   thrust.
        Range: 830 kilometers
        Ceiling: 58750'
        Maximum Speed at 0': 800 kts
        Maximum Speed at 36000': 1260 kts
        Armament: 6-barrel 20mm cannon, 4 missile recesses, 5 weapon pylons
        Air-to-Air Radar Quality: Fair quality and range pulse radar
        Maneuverability: Fair to good
        NOTES: This all-purpose plane served the US Navy and Air Force as
     both a fighter and strike fighter throughout the 1960s and early 1970s.
     In the USAF it is now obsolescent, serving mainly for reconnaissance and
     electronic warfare ("Wild Weasel"). However, hundreds were sold to
     western nations worldwide, including Iran under the Shah. For air-to-air
     combat the plane can carry four AIM-9 Sidewinders and four AIM-7
     Sparrows.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     F-5E Tiger II

        Designer/Manafacturer: Northrop, USA
        Role: Fighter & strike fighter
        Crew: One
        Mission Weight at Takeoff: 12 tons
        Engine(s): Two General Electric J85-GE-21B turbojets for 10000 lbs
                   thrust
        Range: 220 kilometers
        Ceiling: 51000'
                                                                     - 158 -
        Maximum Speed at 0': Not available, probably 500-600 kts
        Maximum Speed at 36000': 950 kts
        Armament: Two 20mm cannon, 5 weapon pylons
        Air-to-Air Radar Quality: Poor quality and range pulse radar
        Maneuverability: Fair
        NOTES: This inexpensive and unsophisticated fighter was never adopted
     by US combat arms, but has been widely sold abroad, including 138 to
     Iran. Underpowered, with poor avionics, it is useful only against
     obsolete opponents. It can carry AIM-9 Sidewinders, but not AIM-7
     Sparrows.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     F-14D Tomcat

        Designer/Manafacturer: Grumman, USA
        Role: Fighter & interceptor
        Crew: Two
        Mission Weight at Takeoff: 35 tons
        Engine(s): originally two Pratt & Whitney TF30-412A turbofans for
                   41800 lbs thrust, upgraded in D model to two General
                   Electric F110-400 turbofans for 54-58000 lbs thrust
        Range: 1280 kilometers
        Ceiling: over 56000'
        Maximum Speed at 0': 800 kts with TF30, higher with F110
        Maximum Speed at 36000': 1350 kts with TF30, higher with F110
        Armament: 6-barrel 20mm cannon, 4 weapons pallets, 2 weapons pylons
        Air-to-Air Radar Quality: Excellent range, high quality doppler radar
        Maneuverability: Good
        NOTES: This heavy, long-range interceptor has extremely powerful
     avionics for use with the AIM-54 Phoenix semi-active radar-homing
     missile, which has a 200 km effective range. The aircraft is the US
     Navy's long-range defender of carrier battle groups. Standard USN
     armament is four Phoenix and four Sidewinder missiles (two per pylon).
     The swinging wings are computer controlled for maximum performance, but
     their swing also shows the plane's energy state to the enemy. In 1987
     the Navy began a program that upgraded the original TF30 engines with
     the newer, more powerful F110s. About 80 TF30-engined F-14s were
     supplied to Iran, but engine troubles, complexities in the avionics
     system, and the delicacy of the Phoenix missiles have greatly reduced
     their military value. They are often used as radar-warning patrol
     aircraft.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     F-15C Eagle

        Designer/Manafacturer: McDonnell Douglas, USA
        Role: Fighter
        Crew: One
        Mission Weight at Takeoff: 22 tons
        Engine(s): Two Pratt & Whitney F100-100 turbofans for 47660 lbs thrust
        Range: 1200 kilometers
                                                                     - 159 -
        Ceiling: 63000'
        Maximum Speed at 0': 810 kts
        Maximum Speed at 36000': 1260 kts or greater
        Armament: 6-barrel 20mm cannon, 4 missile ejectors, 4 weapons pylons,
                  2 FAST pallet points
        Air-to-Air Radar Quality: Medium range, high quality doppler radar
        Maneuverability: Very good
        NOTES: This large, powerful dogfighter is the dream plane of many
     USAF pilots. Although not as nimble as the lightweight F-16, it has
     longer ranged avionics, plus a brute size and power unmatched by any
     fighter until the new Su-27 appeared.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     F-16C Falcon

        Designer/Manafacturer: General Dynamics, USA
        Role: Fighter & strike fighter
        Crew: One
        Mission Weight at Takeoff: 12.5 tons
        Engine(s): One Pratt & Whitney F100-200 turbofan for 23830 lbs thrust
        Range: 540 kilometers
        Ceiling: over 50000'
        Maximum Speed at 0': 800 kts
        Maximum Speed at 36000': 1190 kts
        Armament: 6-barrel 20mm cannon, 7 weapon pylons
        Air-to-Air Radar Quality: Medium range, high quality doppler radar
        Maneuverability: Excellent
        NOTES: The latest production fighter added to the US Air Force, the
     F-16 is the most maneuverable dogfighter in the world (possibly excepting
     the MiG-29). The inherently unstable airframe that gives this agility
     would be unflyable except for the computerized electronic controls, hence
     its nickname "Electric Jet". Advanced air-ground avionics and anti-
     missile defenses are "extras", making the basic aircraft relatively
     cheap. Many western nations have purchased F-16s. However, until the
     AIM-120 AMRAAM it had no long-range AAM.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     F/A-18A Hornet

        Designer/Manafacturer: McDonnell Douglas/Northrop, USA
        Role: Fighter & strike fighter
        Crew: One
        Mission Weight at Takeoff: 18 tons
        Engine(s): Two General Electric F404-400 turbofans for 32000 lbs
                   thrust
        Range: 740 kilometers
        Ceiling: 50000'
        Maximum Speed at 0': less than 660 kts
        Maximum Speed at 36000': 1050 kts
        Armament: 6-barrel 20mm cannon, 9 weapons pylons
        Air-to-Air Radar Quality: Medium range, high quality doppler radar
        Maneuverability: Good to very good (see note below)
                                                                     - 160 -
        NOTES: Although not as maneuverable as the F-16 (see note below),
     this multi-role fighter has numerous avionic and defensive aids built in.
     These were required by the US Navy, its main user, who needed an all-
     purpose fighter and attack bomber able to fire a variety of sophisticated
     weapons. Like the F-16, it also is sold to western nations.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     A-6E Intruder

        Designer/Manafacturer: Grumman, USA
        Role: Attack & interdiction bomber
        Crew: Two
        Mission Weight at Takeoff: 13 tons
        Engine(s): Two Pratt & Whitney J52-8A turbojets for 18600 lbs thrust
        Range: 870 kilometers
        Ceiling: 44600'
        Maximum Speed at 0': 570 kts
        Maximum Speed at 36000': 540 kts
        Armament: 5 weapons pylons
        Air-to-Air Radar Quality: Poor, but superb air-to-ground weapons
                                  radars
        Maneuverability: Fair to poor
        NOTES: Designed at the end of the 1950s as a low-level attack bomber
     for use in bad weather or at night, this plane remains an unqualified
     success. Avionics and weapons have been rebuilt more than once to
     maintain the "state of the art", with upgrades under development.
     Electronic warfare (EA-6 and EA-6B) and aerial tanker (KA-6D) versions
     exist.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     AV-8B Harrier II

        Designer/Manafacturer: British Aerospace, UK (original design) and
                               McDonnell Douglas, USA (American version)
        Role: S/VTOL Fighter & strike fighter
        Crew: One
        Mission Weight at Takeoff: 15 tons STOVL, 10 tons VTOL
        Engine(s): One Rolls Royce Pegasus 11-21E for 22000 lbs vectored
                   thrust (no afterburner)
        Range: 240 kilometers
        Ceiling: 55000'
        Maximum Speed at 0': 585 kts
        Maximum Speed at 36000': 520 kts
        Armament: one 25mm cannon, 7 weapon pylons
        Air-to-Air Radar Quality: Poor, target acquisition is usually visual
        Maneuverability: Very good
        NOTES: Originally designed as a strike fighter, the British-American
     co-redesign greatly enhanced maneuverability. The avionics are designed
     for ground attack rather than air-to-air combat. Despite this, Harriers
     were successful as interceptors and combat air patrol in the 1982
     Falklands War. The Harrier is the primary fighter of the US Marines, the
     British Royal Navy, and frontline squadrons of the British Royal Air
     Force (RAF) in Germany. Usually it
                                                                     - 161 -
     uses short segments of roadway or a "ski-jump" deck for rolling
     takeoffs, and later lands vertically, like a helicopter.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     A-10A Thunderbolt II

        Designer/Manafacturer: Fairchild Republic, USA
        Role: Close support aircraft
        Crew: One
        Mission Weight at Takeoff: 20 tons
        Engine(s): Two General Electric TF34-100 turbofans for 18130 lbs
                   thrust
        Range: 960 kilometers
        Ceiling: under 40000'
        Maximum Speed at 0': 370 kts
        Maximum Speed at 36000': Unknown, probably less than 370 kts
        Armament: 7-barrel 30mm cannon, 11 weapon pylons
        Air-to-Air Radar Quality: Poor, air-to-ground avionics quite basic
        Maneuverability: Very good
        NOTES: This slow, heavily-armored plane was designed purely for
     frontline ground attack with "tank busting" its speciality. This role
     (unglamorous to the USAF), along with its peculiar appearance, earns it
     the unofficial nickname "Warthog". Although intended for combat in
     Europe where low clouds and bad weather are frequent, the A-10 is a
     fair-weather day-only plane. The manafacturer hopes to interest the USAF
     in a night-flying variant, currently without success. Unless protected
     by good fighters (F-15s and F-16s), this plane is doomed if sent into
     airspace contested by USSR fighters.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     EF-111A Raven

        Designer/Manafacturer: General Dynamics, USA
        Role: Electronic warfare escort
        Crew: Two
        Mission Weight at Takeoff: 43.5 tons
        Engine(s): Two Pratt & Whitney TF30-3 turbofans for 37,000 lbs thrust
                   (with afterburners)
        Range: 1,900 kilometers
        Ceiling: 54700'
        Maximum Speed at 0': 700 kts
        Maximum Speed at 36000': 1020 kts
        Armament: ALQ-99E electronic warfare system, no other weapons
        Air-to-Air Radar Quality: Medium-long range, high quality pulse &
                                  doppler
        Maneuverability: Fair
        Notes: This is a specially built electronic warfare version of the
     F-111 strike and interdiction bomber. The original concept of the F-111
     was a high-speed bomber for deep strikes at high and/or low altitude,
     especially at night or in bad weather. The EF-111 is popularly known as
     the "Electric Fox", or "Spark Vark" (the unofficial nickname of the
     F-111 is "Aardvark" or "Vark"). It is designed to accompany deep strike
     and interdiction missions, providing electronic screening and jamming.
     It is the fastest, most powerful such craft in the world.
                                                                     - 162 -
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     B-1B Bomber

        Designer/Manafacturer: Rockwell International, USA
        Role: Strategic bomber
        Crew: Four
        Mission Weight at Takeoff: 225 tons with internal load only
        Engine(s): Four General Electric F101-102 turbofans for 120000 lbs
                   thrust
        Range: 5,900 kilometers
        Ceiling: Unknown, probably under 50000'
        Maximum Speed at 0': 530 kts
        Maximum Speed at 36000': 725 kts
        Armament: 37.5 ton capacity bomb bay, 29.5 tons additional on
                  external mounts if desired
        Air-to-Air Radar Quality: Medium range, high quality doppler radar
        Maneuverability: Poor
        NOTES: This redesign of the B-1A (cancelled in the late 1960s)
     emphasizes low-level attack and minimal radar signature. The aircraft is
     now seriously overloaded by the numerous revisions and often unreliable
     electronic defensive gear. Despite the usual carping from the US press,
     in combat against first-line Russian aircraft this bomber has some hope
     of survival. The obsolescent B-52s it replaces would have no chance
     whatsoever.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     E-3C Sentry "AWACS"

        Designer/Manafacturer: Boeing, USA
        Role: Airborne Early Warning & Control
        Crew: 15 to 17
        Mission Weight at Takeoff: 162.5 tons
        Engine(s): Four Pratt & Whitney TF33-100/100A turbofans for 84000 lbs
                   thrust
        Range: 3000 kilometers (11 hours unrefueled endurance)
        Ceiling: over 29000'
        Cruise Speed at altitude: over 350 kts
        Maximum Speed at altitude: 460 kts
        Armament: Surveillance radar, communications, air traffic control,
                  and electronic defenses; weapons pylons may be added
        Air-to-Air Radar Quality: Excellent range and quality radars
        Maneuverability: Poor
        NOTES: This 707 airliner frame holds the most sophisticated and
     effective airborne radar in the world. No other nation has a plane of
     equivalent effectiveness (the British Nimrod and Russian Moss are
     failures, the new Russian Mainstay is still unproven). Flying "racetrack"
     circles behind friendly lines at 25-30000', this AWACS can watch and
     direct aircraft out to 300 miles range. Until the "C" model upgrade, too
     many aircraft and limited computer power caused temporary "blind spots".
     In wartime weapons pylons carrying AIM-9 Sidewinders or AIM-120 AMRAAMS
     could be added. In addition each Sentry carries various electronic
     defenses and always has a fighter escort.
                                                                     - 163 -
     ========================================================================
     Russian-built Warplanes
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     MiG-21 Fishbed

        Designer/Manafacturer: Mikoyan-Gurevich, USSR
        Role: Fighter
        Crew: one
        Mission Weight at Takeoff: 9 tons
        Engine(s): One Tumansky R-11F2S-300 turbofan for 14500 lbs thrust
        Range: 630 kilometers
        Ceiling: 59000' (often only 50000')
        Maximum Speed at 0': 700 kts
        Maximum Speed at 36000': 1220 kts
        Armament: Two 23mm cannon, 4 weapons pylons, 1 fuel tank pylon
        Air-to-Air Radar Quality: Very short range, low quality pulse radar
        Maneuverability: Good
        NOTES: This agile, maneuverable, easy-flying fighter was the premier
     dogfighting plane of the 1960s and early 1970s. It has simple avionics
     and a standard armament of 2 or 4 AA-2s (now often replaced by AA-8s),
     making it inexpensive to buy, arm and maintain. However, it has little
     or no HUD, weak radars, and low quality defenses, making it obsolete as
     a fighter. Unfortunately, its limited carrying capacity makes it poor as
     a strike fighter.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     MiG-23 Flogger

        Designer/Manafacturer: Mikoyan-Gurevich, USSR
        Role: Fighter
        Crew: One
        Mission Weight at Takeoff: 16 tons
        Engine(s): One Tumansky R-29B turbofan for 27500 lbs thrust
        Range: 900 kilometers
        Ceiling: 61000'
        Maximum Speed at 0': 740 kts
        Maximum Speed at 36000': 1190 kts
        Armament: Two 23mm cannon, 4 weapon pylons, 1 fuel tank pylon
        Air-to-Air Radar Quality: Very poor, short range pulse radar
        Maneuverability: Fair
        NOTES: This swing-wing fighter replacement for the MiG-21 originally
     had few avionics and a 22485 lb. R-27 engine. This variant, incapable of
     firing sophisticated weapons and with serious performance flaws, is
     often sold abroad. The more advanced models, listed above, are mediocre
     performers. All commonly carry AA-2 and/or AA-8 missiles, most USSR and
     East European versions use the AA-7 radar homing missile also. With its
     MiG-27 brother, this plane has huge production runs, making it the
     cheapest fighter available today. This alone makes it one of the world's
     most popular aircraft.
                                                                     - 164 -
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     MiG-27 Flogger

     [Physical appearance equivalent to MiG-23]
        Designer/Manafacturer: Mikoyan-Gurevich, USSR
        Role: Strike Fighter
        Crew: One
        Mission Weight at Takeoff: 22 tons
        Engine(s): One Tumansky R-29 turbofan for 25353 lbs thrust
        Range: 400 kilometers
        Ceiling: 52000'
        Maximum Speed at 0': 635 kts
        Maximum Speed at 36000': 925 kts
        Armament: One 6-barrel 23mm cannon, 5 weapon pylons, 2 bomb racks
        Air-to-Air Radar Quality: Very poor, very short range pulse radar
        Maneuverability: Fair
        NOTES: This is the ground-attack variant of the MiG-23. In Russian
     frontline units it includes a laser designator for laser-guided
     munitions and simple terrain-avoidance radars for low-level attacks.
     Improved jammers and decoys are added as well. However, many
     sophisticated attack aids common on western strike fighters are not
     present. Presumably the MiG-27s compensate for this with quantity, as
     huge production runs greatly lower its cost.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     MiG-25 Foxbat

        Designer/Manafacturer: Mikoyan-Gurevich, USSR
        Role: PVO Interceptor
        Crew: One
        Mission Weight at Takeoff: 40 tons
        Engine(s): Two Tumansky R-31 turbofans for 48500 lbs thrust
        Range: 1100 kilometers
        Ceiling: 80000'
        Maximum Speed at 0': 570 kts
        Maximum Speed at 36000': 1860 kts
        Armament: 4 weapons pylons
        Air-to-Air Radar Quality: Medium quality, medium range pulse radar
        Maneuverability: Poor
        NOTES: This plane was originally designed to defend the distant
     borders of the USSR from air attack, working with special ground radars
     to attack enemy bombers with a special long-ranged AAM (the AA-6). It is
     extremely fast, but quite unmaneuverable. A few are bought by client
     states for status reasons, but the reconnaissance version (MiG-25R) is
     more popular - it's 88,000' ceiling makes it immune to normal SAM or
     fighter interception.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     MiG-29 Fulcrum

        Designer/Manafacturer: Mikoyan-Gurevich, USSR
        Role: Fighter
        Crew: One
        Mission Weight at Takeoff: 18 tons
        Engine(s): Two Tumansky R-33D turbofans for 36600 lbs thrust

                                                                     - 165 -
        Range: 650 kilometers
        Ceiling: Probably 55-65000'
        Maximum Speed at 0': 700 kts
        Maximum Speed at 36000': 1260 kts
        Armament: One multi-barrel cannon, 6 weapons pylons
        Air-to-Air Radar Quality: Medium quality and range doppler radar
        Maneuverability: Very good to excellent
        NOTES: Originally designed to outfight the F-15, this plane is a
     modern, lightweight dogfighter with superlative agility. It has engine
     power in excess of its weight. Common armament is AA-10 "fire and
     forget" radar-homers along with some AA-8 and/or AA-10 IR missiles. The
     degree of sophistication in the avionics is unknown, but unlikely to
     match western models. Considerable debate exists regarding the relative
     superiority of this plane versus the F-16.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     MiG-31 Foxhound

        Designer/Manafacturer: Mikoyan-Gurevich, USSR
        Role: PVO Interceptor
        Crew: One
        Mission Weight at Takeoff: 45 tons
        Engine(s): Two turbofans or turbojets, estimated thrust 50-60000 lbs
        Range: 1500 kilometers
        Ceiling: 75500'
        Maximum Speed at 0': 790 kts
        Maximum Speed at 36000': 1400 kts
        Armament: Cannon possible, 4 missile recesses, 4 weapons pylons
        Air-to-Air Radar Quality: Superior quality and range doppler radar
        Maneuverability: Fair
        NOTES: This aircraft is a redesigned MiG-25. Although slightly slower,
     it is improved in all other categories, especially low-altitude
     interceptions against planes and cruise missiles. The new AA-9 long-range
     missile is designed for look-down attacks on low-level cruise missiles.
     It also has AA-8s and AA-10s.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Su-24 Fencer

        Designer/Manafacturer: Sukhoi, USSR
        Role: Strike Fighter & Interdictor
        Crew: Two
        Mission Weight at Takeoff: 43.5 tons
        Engine(s): Two Tumansky R-29B turbofans for 50700 lbs thrust
        Range: 300 to 1800 kilometers (varies with mission profile and load)
        Ceiling: 57400'
        Maximum Speed at 0': 765 kts
        Maximum Speed at 36000': 1400 kts
        Armament: 6-barrel 23mm cannon, 8 weapon pylons
        Air-to-Air Radar Quality: nil, avionics designed purely for
                                  air-ground role
        Maneuverability: Fair
        NOTES: This is the most advanced air-ground attack plane built by the
     USSR. Externally it appears similar to the F-111, including the side-by-
     side
                                                                     - 166 -
     seating in the cockpit. However, its armament and avionics are
     designed for front-line and rear-area strikes, into the teeth of enemy
     air defenses. Western air and ground commanders fear the Su-24 more than
     any other Soviet aircraft. The aircraft may carry a few AA-8s for
     self-defense, but it is not designed for air-to-air combat.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Su-27 Flanker

        Designer/Manafacturer: Sukhoi, USSR
        Role: Fighter
        Crew: One
        Mission Weight at Takeoff: 25 tons
        Engine(s): Two unknown turbojets for estimated 60000 lbs thrust
        Range: 1150 kilometers
        Ceiling: probably 60000' or more
        Maximum Speed at 0': 725 kts
        Maximum Speed at 36000': 1350 kts
        Armament: Probably a cannon, 6 weapons pylons
        Air-to-Air Radar Quality: Above average quality and range doppler
                                  radar
        Maneuverability: Very good to excellent
        NOTES: This aircraft was designed to defeat the F-14 and F-15
     fighters. It is a large, powerful dogfighter whose usual armament is
     probably four AA-8 and four AA-10 missiles. In comparison to the MiG-29,
     the Su-27 is a larger, heavier plane. If its avionics and flight
     controls are truly modern, the Su-27 may be the superior plane. However,
     in dogfighting maneuverability the MiG-29 and F-16 probably have the
     edge.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Yak-38 Forger

        Designer/Manafacturer: Yakovlev, USSR
        Role: VTOL Fighter
        Crew: One
        Mission Weight at Takeoff: 12 tons
        Engine(s): One Lyulka AL-21 vectored-thrust turbojet for 17985 lbs
                   thrust (no afterburner), plus two Koliesov lift engines
        Range: 370 kilometers
        Ceiling: 39370'
        Maximum Speed at 0': 535 kts
        Maximum Speed at 36000': 550 kts
        Armament: 4 weapons pylons
        Air-to-Air Radar Quality: Poor quality and range pulse radar
        Maneuverability: Fair
        NOTES: Originally known as the Yak-36MP, this vertical take-off
     fighter operates from the Kiev-class aircraft carriers. These lack the
     equipment and deck space for conventional jets. Initially thought to be
     a Russian equivalent of the Harrier, the Yak-38 is considerably
     inferior. It has a limited interception ability and very limited strike
     capacity. However, until this plane the Russian navy had nothing bigger
     than helicopters for its warships at sea.
                                                                     - 167 -
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Tu-26 Backfire

        Designer/Manafacturer: Tupolev, USSR
        Role: Bomber
        Crew: Four
        Mission Weight at Takeoff: 61 tons
        Engine(s): Two uprated Kuznetsov NK-144 turbofans for 88180 lbs thrust
        Range: 5500 kilometers
        Ceiling: 55000'
        Maximum Speed at 0': 525 kts
        Maximum Speed at 36000': 970 kts
        Armament: Three heavy Air-Surface missiles or 13 tons of bombs
        Air-to-Air Radar Quality: Fair, with excellent air-to-surface avionics
        Maneuverability: Very poor
        NOTES: Many of these swing-wing bombers are in service with the Soviet
     naval air arm, carrying long-range missiles to attack hostile warships up
     to 3000 kilometers out to sea. The Backfire's exceptionally long range
     and high speed, plus its powerful missiles make it a mortal threat to
     USN aircraft carriers. With aerial refueling it has sufficient range to
     get within curise-missile-launch position of the USA. As a gesture to
     arms control, the USSR has removed air refueling equipment from its Air
     Force Backfires.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Tu-95D Bear

        Designer/Manafacturer: Tupolev, USSR
        Role: Reconnaissance bomber
        Crew: 7-12
        Mission Weight at Takeoff: unknown, about 145-165 tons
        Engine(s): four Kuznetsov NK-12MV turboprops
        Range: 8250 kilometers (7 hours endurance)
        Ceiling: 41000'
        Maximum Speed at 0': 410 kts
        Maximum Speed at 36000': 475 kts
        Armament: Unarmed
        Air-to-Air Radar Quality: Very good long-range pulse radars
        Maneuverability: Terrible
        NOTES: The Tu-95 has been the world's most sophisticated turboprop
     bomber for over thirty years (it entered service in 1955). It is
     primarily used for long-range reconnaissance, electronic intelligence,
     electronic warfare (jamming), anti-ship missiles, and cruise-missiles.
     The "D" model is a reconnaissance version, the "H" model (on a slightly
     modified airframe) a cruise-missile carrier.
                                                                     - 168 -
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Il-76 Mainstay

        Designer/Manafacturer: Ilyushin, USSR
        Role: Airborne Early Warning & Control (AEW&C)
        Crew: Estimated at 15 to 20
        Mission Weight at Takeoff: About 150 tons
        Engine(s): four Soloview D-30KP turbofans for 106000 lbs thrust
        Range: About 6400 kilometers (7 hours endurance)
        Ceiling: About 40-50000'
        Maximum Speed at 0': 400 kts
        Maximum Speed at 36000': 460 kts
        Armament: Possibly twin 23mm tail cannon, 2-4 weapons pylons
        Air-to-Air Radar Quality: Excellent long-range doppler radars
        Maneuverability: Terrible
        NOTES: The "Mainstay" is a conversion of the huge Il-76 Candid
     transport plane to "AWACS" duties. Its purpose is to detect enemy
     aircraft and low-flying missiles, and act as a mobile, airborne command
     post that controls friendly aircraft engaging such threats. The earlier
     Tu-126 "Moss" AEW&C with turboprops was a disastrous failure. Like many
     AEW&C planes, the Il-76 could carry a few AAMs (AA-8s or AA-10s) for
     self defense, as well as extensive jammers, decoys, etc.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     An-72 Coaler

        Designer/Manafacturer: Antonov, USSR
        Role: Air transport
        Crew: 3
        Mission Weight at Takeoff: 28 tons
        Engine(s): Two Lotarev D-36 turbofans for 28660 lbs thrust
        Range: 1000 kilometers (max cargo) to 3800 kilometers (no cargo)
        Ceiling: 36100'
        Maximum Speed at 0': 350 kts
        Maximum Speed at 36000': 410 kts
        Armament: unarmed; can carry 32 passengers or 11 tons cargo
        Air-to-Air Radar Quality: Navigational only
        Maneuverability: Terrible for a fighter, but good for a transport
        NOTES: This is the latest general-purpose medium air transport of
     the Soviet Union. Its jet engines and short-takeoff performance make in
     an outstanding utility craft for transporting all types of personnel and
     cargo between remote airfields.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
                                                                     - 169 -
                               <<< EMPTY >>>                         - 170 -

                                   APPENDIX:
                                   ---------

     Glossary:
     ---------

     AAM: Air-to-air missile.
     Ace: Pilot with five or more confirmed kills of enemy aircraft.
     Ace-of-the-Base: Best flyer in the squadron.
     AFV: Armored Fighting Vehicle, an armored vehicle designed for front
          line combat. This includes tanks, armored personnel carriers,
          anti-aircraft tanks, SAM missile carriers, etc.
     AGM: Air-to-Ground Missile. Originally used by the US Air Force for
          missiles designed to hit land surface targets, but commonly
          extended to mean missiles designed for use against land or sea
          targets.
     ARM: Anti-radiation Missile. Missile designed to home on enemy radar
          sets.
     ASM: Air-to-Surface Missile. Often used for missiles designed to attack
          ships, but sometimes generalized to mean any missile launched
          against targets on the surface of the earth.
     Bravo Sierra: Military words for BS, which in turn is an abbreviation
          for a common expletive, here indicating something especially
          unpleasant or unbelievable. For example: "Doing the bunny hop down
          the brunway to a bellyflop landing, then complaining about the wind
          sheer, is true Bravo Sierra!"
     BVR: Beyond Visual Range. Any engagement where you cannot visually
          distinguish the target. During peacetime pilots are often prohibited
          from firing BVR. for fear of hitting the wrong target.
     CAP: Combat Air Patrol. Aircraft patrolling over friendly forces.
          Originally it meant fighters launched from aircraft carriers, and
          assigned to patrol over those carriers, protecting them from air
          attack.
     Check your Six: Watch your tail; literally, watch the six o'clock
          position of your aircraft.
     Colors: Silk neck scarf worn by fighter pilots.
     Ditch: Bail out, esp. over water.
                                                                     - 171 -

     Driver: Pilot.
     ECM: Electronic Counter-measures. Devices designed to jam or fool
          ("spoof") enemy electronic sensors, notably radar.
     ECCM: Electronic Counter-counter-measures. Devices designed to protect
          against jamming or "spoofing" by enemy ECM.
     Electric Jet: F-16 Falcon.
     Fangs Out: Seeking air-to-air victory in a dogfight, regardless of other
          dangers or considerations, such as worry about other enemy
          aircraft, your EMV, or even your altitude. See Knife Fight.
     FEBA: Forward Edge of the Battle Area. Older NATO abbreviation for the
          front line or battle line with the enemy.
     FitRep: Fitness Report. A report by commander that recommends
          subordinates for promotion (or not, as appropriate).
     FLOT: Forward Line of Troops. Current NATO abbreviation for the front
          line or battle line with the enemy.
     Flying a Desk: Staff or command job with no flying duties.
     Frisbee: Unofficial nickname of the F-19 Stealth Fighter.
     HUD: Head-Up Display. A large piece of glass mounted on the cockpit
          front arranged so a pilot can look forward through the glass. All
          crucial (i.e., "real time") information is projected onto the
          glass, so the pilot can watch the outside while getting detailed
          information. Some HUDs have become so complex they defeat their
          designed purpose (and are equipped with a "de-clutter" switch!).
     Knife Fight: Dogfight to the death - what happens when you go
          "fangs out." This situation is advantageous to low-speed, highly
          maneuverable planes and disadvantageous to higher speed but less
          maneuverable planes. However, either or both contestants can be
          surprised by other fighters and SAMs.
     ILS: Instrument Landing System. A device that receives signals from an
          airport and displays to the pilot his position in relationship to a
          hypothetical glide path.
     INS: Inertial Navigation System. A device that keeps track of an
          airplanes's position (using a gyroscope) and displays that position
          and a desired destination. There are many different types of INS
          systems; those which use cockpit CRT maps and HUD pointers are the
          most sophisticated.
     IR: Infrared. A portion of the electro-magnetic spectrum where the
          intensity of the signal is directly related to the heat of the
          object.
     Mike Mike: Military words for "mm", generally referring to 20 mm cannon
          shells. Ex: "Then i placed some Mike Mike right up his tail".
     MiG: Mikoyan-Gurevich design bureau, which specializes in the design and
          construction of jet fighters for the Soviet Union. Often used as a
          generic name for all Soviet-bulit fighter aircraft (even though
          other bureaus contribute fighter designs).
     Niner Reference to the AIM-9 Sidewinder missile. The 9L version is known
          as the "Niner Lima", the 9M version used by the F-19 is a "Niner
          Mike".
                                                                     - 172 -

     Obsolescent: Outdated but not yet useless; not quite obsolete.
     Promo: Promotion.
     Pucker Factor: Level of fear (e.g., "When those 20 Flankers jumped us,
          the pucker factor sure went up!").
     Punch His Ticket: To shoot down an enemy fighter plane.
     Punch Out: Specifically to bail out using an ejection seat, but generally
          applied to a departure ("Let's punch out of here!").
     SAM: Surface-to-Air Missile.
     Sierra Hotel: Military expansion of the letters "SH", here an
          abbreviation for heated excrement. Curiously, the expression
          denotes admiration and excitement. For example, "Sierra Hotel, look
          at that guy smoke MiGs!".
     Skunk Works: Quasi-official nickname of the Lockhead plant in Burbank,
          California that designs and builds top-secret aircraft.
     Smoke: To destroy, as in "Smoked that MiG!". Originally from the smoke
          plume emitted by burning aircraft as they fall to earth.
     Star: As in, "getting your star." Refers to the much coveted promotion
          from Colonel to General, where your rank insignia is now a single
          gold star.
     VVI: Vertical Velocity Indicator. A gauge that indicates how fast a
          plane is ascending or decending.
     Whiskey Delta: Military expansion of the letters WD, which in turn
          refers to weakness in a certain male organ rarely discussed in
          polite company. The term is an especially derogatory and insulting
          description of a fighter pilot (e.g., "that Whiskey Delta couldn't
          even find his own airbase, much less hit it with a bomb.").
     Wing Weenie: Administrative staff officer attached to a fighter unit, but
          with no combat or flying duties. A mildly derogatory term.
     Zero-Zero: Nickname for the zero-zero type ejection seat. So named
          because in theory, a pilot can eject safely from a plane with zero
          speed and zero altitude (i.e., sitting on a runway).
                                                                     - 173 -
                                     Notes:
                                     ------
     Designer's Notes:
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     The Concept:

        MicroProse's fame and reputation have come from flight simulators,
     especially the classic F-15 Strike Eagle, first published in 1984. Since
     that date we've released many novel and popular products (Silent
     Service, Pirates, Airborne Ranger), but only one combat flight
     simulator, Gunship, and that about a helicopter (the AH-64A Apache). In
     the meantime, flight simulators have suddenly become popular, with
     almost every software publisher scrambling onto the bandwagon.
        Clearly, it was time for us to create a new military aircraft
     simulator, a state-of-the-art product that showed what "flight simulator
     experts" could do. For this we selected the F-19 "Frisbee" Stealth
     Fighter. Although the plane is both conjectural and highly classified,
     it is the ideal subject for a one-man/one-plane/one-mission situation.
     Modern air attacks are usually a complex dance of many different
     machines, each with a unique specialty and role - the scouts, the
     electronic warfare escorts, the strike planes, the fighter cover, and
     the AWACS airborn controllers. The F-19 is the exception: it flies
     alone, relying on stealth and subtlety instead of brute force. not since
     1916 have fighter pilots gone off alone to duel the enemy. Now that
     bygone era of the lone wolf hero is possible again, in a very modern,
     high-tech environment

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     The Design:

     Our first "new generation" jet simulator appeared in late 1987,  for the
     Commodore C64/C128. Originally titled "Project: Stealth Fighter", it was
     an impressive, ground-breaking achievement for 8-bit, 1 MHz, 64K
     computers. However, the 3-D graphics technology in that simulator was
     customized to its limited environment. The 16-bit, 4.77 to 25 MHz
     computers with 384K or more required an entirely new programming
     approach. Our experience with earlier flight simulators, including
     Gunship, was a tremendous help in deciding what to do, and what not to
     do.
        When you look at a flight simulator, the first thing to check is the
     detail and fidelity of the "3-D" out-the-cockpit graphics. Many
     "simulators" use arcade-style sprite graphics. They move a picture of
     the object around the screen. There are two or three (or four, or
     whatever) sizes of each picture, to give the impression of depth; but
     it's still really in two-dimensional cardboard cutout sliding around the
     screen. In comparsion, a true simulator like F-19 Stealth Fighter has a
     data record for each object's dimensions, and then adjusts it for
     distance and viewing angle, as well as removing objects hidden behind
     others. We also add a scaling adjustment to compensate for the
     "coarseness" of a computer screen. This is because the human eye can see
     tiny forms and shapes that are rendered as a dot on screen. To achieve
     all this on a microcomputer you must make constant trade-offs between
     speed and detail.
        You'll notice that this program automatically adjusts itself to the
     speed of
                                                                     - 174 -
     your computer. Regardless of wheter your processor is a 4.77 MHz 8088 or
     a 25 MHz 80386, the simulation moves at the same real-time speed. The
     only changes are in the smoothness and detail of the 3-D out-the-cockpit
     graphics. You can even change the smoothness/detail tradeoffs we
     selected with the Detail Adjust key.
        It's quite possible to create a technically impressive and factually
     accurate simulation, that is nonetheless a turkey. We don't allow that
     at MicroProse. The experience of flying the simulation, the "game play"
     (if you insist on viewing this as a game) must be enjoyable and
     interesting. We spend a great deal of time on the "feel" of the flight
     controls, organizing the worlds you fly in, the changing radar
     environment, the skill of enemy pilots, enemy reaction times, and much
     more.
        All this realism in a flight simulator must still have a purpose. In
     our case, the purpose is playable, enjoyable situations. Who wants a
     simulator that kills you unless you've logged thousands of hours of
     flying? We want more than accurate missile ranges or realistic Paveway
     attack profiles. We also want an endless supply of new missions,
     situations, and opponents. We want the enemy to behave logically and
     rationally in these new situations. We want you to have new problems and
     new opportunities, with every mission. Further-more, we've willing to
     spend the time and effort needed. However, we try to make things easy to
     learn and use. After all, what good are fifty zillion software features
     if you can't find them? So we insisted on including maps and keyboard
     overlays.
        Some of our customers have asked for specific program data,
     especially scoring data. Unfortunately, while boardgames present this in
     simple tables or lists, we use more complicated techniques. In fact, the
     scoring logic is so complicated that we wrote a separate "scoring
     tester" program just to check it. But the objective of this complexity
     is simple: don't fly the plane for the maximum point score. Instead,
     imagine yourself a real pilot, in a real situation, and act accordingly.
     The scoring is like your CO, rewarding your good judgement, and pointing
     out your mistakes!

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     The Design Team:

        Simulations such as F-19 Stealth Fighter require a large, talented
     creative team to produce. The 16-bit version was engineered by that
     now-famous team of Sid Meier (master of algorithms and data structures
     that recreate reality) and Andy Hollis (one of the hottest 3-D and
     assembly programmers in the nation).
        Sid's the founding father of MicroProse (along with President "Wild
     Bill" Stealey), and brings a veteran viewpoint of game programming and
     game design. A large number of features in this product started with Sid
     saying, "Wouldn't it be neat if..." The neat part is that Sid then goes
     and implements the code that very day!
        Andy is one of MicroProse's veterans, and has done fast, tight 3-D
     code before - in C64 Gunship, and then again in IBM Gunship. Each time
     Andy finds new ways to get more, faster, in less space. Andy isn't our
     only 3-D expert. For
                                                                     - 175 -
     example, he used some Scott Spanburg's secret and magical object logic,
     which Scott had just finished conjuring for another (future) MicroProse
     product. Andys a great fan of high speed anywhere: in computers and in
     cars (he races autocross in his spare time).
        Jim Synoski, creator of the original C64 Stealth Fighter, was dragged
     into this version to help out. He was nice about it, especially about
     all the things Sid changed! He worked with ace computer artist Max
     ("Maximum") Remington to create the entire preflight and postflight
     system. Even an "old guard" expert like Jim, veteran of many other
     MicroProse games, can be impressed (distressed?) by the complexity and
     detail involved in Briefings and Debriefings. The apparently limitless
     variety if IBM graphics modes (VGA, MCGA, EGA, CGA, Tandy and Hercules)
     doesn't help!
        The 3D databases for the four "worlds" were created by game designer
     Bruce Shelley and artist Max Remington. It was here that "Maximum" got
     his nickname. For a while every object he created went right to the data
     space maximum, causing something new to "blow" in Andy's code, like an
     engine overrevving too far. Fortunatly 3D graphic glitches are fairly
     obvious to a trained eye - all were spotted and eventually fixed.
     Bruce's job was more difficult. A veteran of many board wargame designs,
     he worked within the very complicated and often frustrating limitations
     of a microcomputer's data space layout. The remarkable fidelity of the
     data space world to the "real" world is a testament to his perseverence.
     Fortunately he was a good sport through it all, perhaps inspired by the
     7:00 AM basketball games in the warehouse with "Major Bill" and other
     B-ball fanatics within MicroProse.
        All this data and graphics takes up a lot of room. In fact, F-19
     Stealth Fighter on our development systems occupies about 5 megabytes
     (fifteen 360K floppy disks!). It's problems like these that David
     McKibbin was born to solve. His compression schemes "shrank" the code
     and data to its current size! Every time the disk drive loads something,
     it runs through a special "decompressor" that expands the code and/or
     data to "full size" in memory. This means you're getting a product that
     would otherwise require a hard disk and command a retail price well over
     $100. So David's saving you a lot of cash as well as making F-19
     commercially viable.
        The paper materials were conceived by designer Arnold Hendrick,
     author of this manual. Usually MicroProse's marketing department is
     concerned about the size, weight and cost of our manuals (not that it
     does any good, the manuals always go over budget). But for this product
     the word was, "go all out". Arnold took them at that, although they
     gulped hard when the page estimate jumped from 128 to 192! The rumor
     that marketing's office furniture was pawned to pay for the extra paper
     is entirely unfounded. Incidentally, the design, layout and artwork of
     the manual, maps and overlays were all done on computer with final
     output on Linotronic typesetters. In his alter ego as manager of the
     game design group, Arnold kibbitzed unmercifully about various aspects
     of the 
                                                                     - 176 -
     design. Surprisingly, Sid, Andy, Jim and Bruce even took him seriously
     (at times)
        Murray Taylor, 3-D artist extraordinaire, designed the basic "look"
     of this manual, executed the weapons illustrations, and did the six
     full-page computer pictures that grace these pages (OBS! not included in
     ASCII version.. sorry but it's quite hard to do em with ASCII "GRAPHIC"
     -* SNUSKBUSKE/DUAL CREW *-) How he finds time for the triathlon remains
     a mystery even within MicroProse.
        Barbara Bents did veoman (veowoman?) work with the technical
     drawings, maps and keyboard overlays. MicroProse uses state-of-the-art
     drafting and layout software on MacII's for many internal graphics.
     Barbara's designs, however, consistently went beyond the abilities of
     current postscript interpreters. Unfortunately, we didn't write the
     software... so when we phoned the creators they just said, "Oh, gee,
     sorry. You'll just have to do less complicated things!" The keyboard
     overlays were difficult for a different reason: we redesigned about as
     fast as she could redraw them on the Mac! For surviving these trails and
     tribulations, she wins MicroProse's competitive and coveted "most
     tolerant artist of the year" award.
        Everybody at MicroProse takes Ken Lagace for granted. He's the quiet,
     silver-haired gent who gave up teaching and performing professional
     classical music for a career as a computer sound composer, with scores
     of brilliant scores to his credit. You'll probably take him for granted
     too, since the sounds for F-19 Stealth Fighter fit right in!
        Finally, the QA (quality assurance) staff at MicroProse approached
     this product like all others: with the maniacal glee of a mad scientist!
     Al Roireau, Chris Taormino and Russ Cooney just love to find bugs, then
     torment the poor, exhausted programmers with multi-page bug reports. In
     fact, they enjoyed it so much they stayed late nights, then came in on
     Saturdays and Sundays, for weeks on end, for just that purpose. In fact
     they're still cackling over the airfield-in-the-ocean bug, or the 1500
     kts level flight bug, or... well, you get the idea. Unlike many software
     companies, at MicroProse QA really does have the final say for shipment.
     Until "Big Al" gives thumbs up, the product stays in testing and the
     programmers continue slaving over the bugs.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Copy Protection:

        F-19 Stealth Fighter is protected from duplication in software, and
     throught the aircraft identification quiz. Responding to past critiques,
     we've changed our schemes, making them unobtrusive. You can copy files
     to and from hard disks normally. However, we have not removed software
     copy protection.
        The reason is simple: the tragic truth is that some people aren't as
     honest as you, the reader, who's purchased F-19 Stealth Fighter. The
     situation is much worse abroad, where organized piracy of American
     software is rampant in many nations. A substantial portion of your
     purchasing dollars go toward R&D on new and better simulations. You
     purchase helps support our future work on new and better simulations. In
     other words, by buying this product, you're investing in quality future
     products. Copy protection is an "insurance policy" that helps protect
     and maximize this investment.
                                                                     - 177 -
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Secrets & Politics:

        When creating simulations of military equipment that are partly or
     entirely classified, such as a stealth fighter, MicroProse has a
     standing policy: use only unclassified sources. Although we talk to real
     pilots and military personnel, we neither solicit nor use any classified
     information. Naturally, we must make some educated guessed. However, the
     amount of information available to the public is quite remarkable if you
     know where to look and how to interpret seemingly unrelated details. In
     the past our "guesses" have turned out correct more often than we
     imagined. One USAF pilot, a brigadier general, confessed to us his
     surprise at how close our C64 version was to an unspecified plane he'd
     worked with!
        Our selection of regions for game scenarios is not intended to convey
     a political viewpoint, or promote antipathy toward any nationally or
     race. Military forces are required to fight whomever their government
     says is the enemy (even other family members, in a civil war). In this
     simulation, as in all our products, political circumstances of the day
     dictate who is hostile to whom. In the late 1980s problems with Lybia,
     Iran, and the USSR loom large in America's war planning.
        In summary, military simulations like F-19 Stealth Fighter allow us
     to experience the vicarious thrills of combat flying without having to
     declear war on anyone, much less hurt anybody. We enjoyed creating F-19
     Stealth Fighter. We're sure you'll enjoy flying her.

     ========================================================================
     Further Reading:

        A wide variety of sources were consulted for this simulation. No
     single source gives specifics on aircraft tactics and weapons,
     especially as they apply to a hypothetical stealth fighter. Among the
     many books and magazines used, the following stand out as generally
     available and interesting reading:

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Books:

        Advanced Technology Warfare, by Friedman, Miller, Richardson,
     Gunston, Hoobs and Walmer, 1985, Salamander Books, London / Crown
     Publishers, New York. This book has a variety of interesting details
     about current and near future equipment and tactics, including various
     speculative designs for stealth fighters.
        Arsenal of Democracy, by Tom Gervasi, various editions in early
     1980s, Grove Press Inc., New York City. This volume, updated with II,
     and later III, is a detailed survey of all American defense systems.
     Although the author's intent was perhaps to horrify you with the cost,
     purpose, and occasional ineptitude in the systems described, the volume
     does have a variety of details and illustrations unavailable elsewhere.
        Fighter Combat: Tactics and Maneuvering, by Robert L. Shaw, 1985,
     Naval Institute Press, Annapolis, Maryland. This is the book on modern
     fighter tactics. Extremely detailed, technical, and specific, it puts
     all other books to shame. If you're serious about dogfighting with jets,
     put aside the glossy picture books and dig into this.
                                                                     - 178 -
        Modern Airborn Missiles, by Bill Gunston, 1983, Salamander Books,
     London / Arco, New York. This small, moderately priced volume is an
     excellent unified source of data on airborne missiles, including model
     histories that would otherwise require considerable digging. Unlike most
     volumes in the series, it has some very useful and specific data.
        Modern Weapons, Ray Bonds editor, 1985, Salamander Books, London /
     Crescent Books, New York. Of the innumerable Salamander books on modern
     military equipment (books which often copy sections from one other!),
     this volume stands out as a useful, concise source for many items.
        Modern Air Combat, Bill Gunston & Mike Spick, 1983, Salamander Books,
     London / Crescent Books, New York. This is the standard glossy "picture
     book" about modern air warfare. It is an excellent and entertaining
     introduction to the subjects, with lots of useful illustrations. If
     you're limited to just one book on contemporary air warfare, buy this
     one.
        Stealth Aircraft, Bill Sweetman, 1986, Motorbooks International,
     Osceola, Wisconsin. This book presents a design history of stealth
     aircraft technology since World War II, details on stealth construction
     techniques, and speculations on future stealth aircraft, including both
     the F-19 stealth fighter and the B-2 stealth bomber. The speculations
     here were very close to the design the USAF unveiled about the B-2 in
     1988.
        USAFE, by Michael Skinner, 1983, Presidio Press, Novato, California.
     This small book is full of photographs of the US Air Force in Europe
     (USAFE) and lots of pilot lingo. The author spent considerable time with
     combat pilots in Europe, and it shows. If you want to get into the
     spirit of military flying, this book encapsulates it very nicely.
        Zones of Conflict: an Atlas of Future Wars, by Keegan & Wheatcroft,
     1986, Simon and Schuster, New York City. This book provides many useful
     insights into the world's trouble spots, why they are troubled, and the
     resource of the various contestants. Unfortunately, the book is a bit
     too general, with little specific data.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Periodical Publications:

        Aviation Week & Space Technology, published weekly by McGraw-Hill,
     New York City. This magazine is the premier source of information about
     the entire aerospace industry, including military programs. Anyone
     interested in large scale aviation operations, or in space programs,
     should subscribe. A variety of articles and reports first appeared here
     on stealth aircraft and stealth technology.
        Jane's Weapon Systems, published annually by Jane's Publishing
     Company Ltd, London. This expensive volume provides indispensible
     specifics on missiles, radars, and electronic equipment of all types and
     descriptions. In other words, it gives the details about the equipment
     on the weapons platform, an extremely important issue often overlooked
     in modern warfare. Like all Jane's, the information is limited to what
     the manufacturer and various national governments publish. However, due
     to the desire for overseas arms
                                                                     - 179 -
     sales, this data can be fairly extensive.
        Jane's All the World's Aircraft, published annually by Jane's
     Publishing Company Ltd, London. This is the standard volume on world
     aircraft, complete with performance statistics and model variants. Each
     aircraft is illustrated with both line drawings and photos. Specifics on
     electronic systems and armamentare sparse (see Jane's Weapons Systems
     for that).
        The Military Balance, published annually by International Institute
     for Strategic Studies, London. This moderately priced report is a gold
     mine of specific information about equipment and orders of battle for
     every nation in the world. No serious student of modern military affairs
     should be without it.
        Soviet Military Power, published annually by the US Department of
     Defense, in Washington DC. This propoganda document appears each year as
     part of DoD's publicity broadside for more and better weapons (not that
     America doesn't occasionally need them, mind you!). Although extremely
     general, it always reveals at least one new Soviet weapon system each
     year, as well as a variety of small but interesting facts.
        War Annual, by John Laffin, published annualy by Brassey's, London.
     This short volume is a compendium of news reports and public statements
     about any and all wars happening around the world. No less than 34
     different wars (including guerilla wars) are listed in the War Annual 2
     of 1987, with three to six pages of information on each. Although the
     data is slim, the volumes are an excellent continuing overview of
     current conflicts.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Maps:

        The Times Atlas of the World, 7th edition (1985), with maps by John
     Bartholomew & Sons, Edinburgh. This is, by far, the single best volume
     of topographical world maps currently available. Although the price is
     high, it's worth any number of less expensive volumes (we have five
     others, and none match this one).
        Defense Mapping Agency, Washington DC, produces land, sea, and
     aeronautical maps and charts for the military, and for various civilian
     agencies such as the National Ocean Service. The military maps available
     through the DMA vary from year to year with the whims of policy. Our
     practice is to purchase anything interesting every few years, since they
     do not maintain a back catalog (i.e., what they have now is usually
     unavailable a few years hence).
                                                                     - 180 -

     Credits:
     --------

                                  Game Design:
        (based on an original design by Jim Synoski and Arnold Hendrick)

                                IBM Programming:
            Andy Hollis, Sid Meier and Jim Synoski with David Taylor

                               Computer Graphics:
                      Max Remington III with Murray Taylor

                            World Graphics Database:
                      Bruce Shelley with Max Remington III

                             Music & Sound Effects:
                                   Ken Lagace

                               Quality Assurance:
                                  Alan Roireau

                                  Playtesting:
     Alan Roireau, Chris Taormino, Russ Cooney, Chucky Dixon, Steve Meyer,
            Bill Stealey, Arnold Hendrick, Bruce Shelley, Sid Meier

                                    Manual:
                                Arnold Hendrick
                    SNUSKBUSKE / DUAL CREW   (ASCII version)

                             Maps & Illustrations:
                        Barbara Bents and Murray Taylor

                                   Packaging:
                           Mark Ciola with John Emory

                                                                     - 181 -
                          (REMOVED)                                  - 182 -
                          (REMOVED)                                  - 183 -
     Index:
     ------

       Note: This index only reference major descriptive sections, and is
                   intended or quick, explanatory reference.
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     (A)  A-6E "Intruder" bomber: 161
          A-10A "Thunderbolt II" bomber: 162
          AA-2 "Atoll" IR guided missile, data: 132, 136
          AA-6 "Acrid" IR guided missile, data: 132, 137
          AA-6 "Acrid" radar-guided missile, data: 132, 138
          AA-7 "Apex" IR guided missile, data: 132, 137
          AA-7 "Apex" radar-guided missile, data: 132, 138
          AA-8 "Aphid" IR guided missile, data: 132, 137
          AA-9 "Amos" radar-guided missile, data: 132, 139
          AA-10 "Alamo" IR guided missile, data: 132, 137
          AA-10 "Alamo" radar-guided missile, data: 132, 139
          AAM: see air-to-air missiles, or specific model name
          Accelerate time: 33
          Acrid (AA-6) radar-guided missile, data: 132, 138
          Acrid (AA-6 IR) guided missile, data: 132, 137
          AEW&C airborne early warning & control planes, Il-76 "Mainstay":
                102, 109, 169, 120, 125
          AGM-65D "Maverick" air-to-ground missile, data: 129-131, 141
          AGM-84A "Harpoon" air-to-ship missile, data: 129-131, 140
          AGN-88A "HARM" anti-radar missile, data: 129-131, 141
          AIM-120A AMRAAM radar-guided missile, data: 129-131, 135
          AIM-7E "Sparrow" radar-guided missile, data: 132, 138, 115
          AIM-9H "Sidewinder" IR guided missile, data: 132, 136, 115
          AIM-9M "Sidewinder" IR guided missile, data: 129-131, 135
          Air-to-air combat: 57-58, 91-96, 101-103
          Air-to-air missiles, data: 129-132, 136-141
          Air-to-air missiles, how to use: 44, 57-58, 89-90, 92
          Air-to-air missiles, principles of: 89
          Air-to-air missions, described: 101-103
          Air-to-ground combat: 78-88, 103-105
          Air-to-ground missiles, data: 129-132, 140-146
          Air-to-ground missiles, how to use: 44, 57-58, 78-79, 89-90, 92
          Airbase layout: 51-52
          Aircraft carrier deck layout: 51-52
          Aircraft carrier landings: 54-55, 71-73
          Aircraft carrier launches: 49
          Aircraft, data: 158-169
          Aircraft, identification of: 25, 157-169
          Airdrop, of special equipmeny: 60, 103
          Air Force Cross (AFC): 65, 67
          Airman's Medal (AM): 23, 65
          Alamo (AA-10) radar-guided missile, data: 132, 139
          Alamo IR (AA-10 IR) guided missile, data: 132, 137
                                                                     - 184 -
          Amos (AA-9) radar-guided missile, data: 132, 139
          AMRAAM (AIM-120A) radar-guided missile, data: 129-131, 135
          An-72 "Coaler" air transport: 169, 109, 115, 120, 126
          Angle of attack: 70
          Apex (AA-7) radar-guided missile, data: 132, 138
          Apex IR (AA-7 IR) guided missile, data: 132, 137
          Aphid IR (AA-8 IR) guided missile, data: 132, 137
          Arming: 29, see also Ordnance
          ASM air-to-ship missiles: see air-to-ground missiles, Penguin, or
               Harpoon
          Atool (AA-2) IR guided missile, data: 132, 136
          Austria: see Central Europe
          Autopilot and "AUTO" light: 40
          AV-8B "Harrier II" fighter: 161
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     (B)  "Boss" hide game: 33
          B-1B bomber: 163
          Backfire (Tu-26) bomber: 168
          Bail out: 43, 64
          Bay doors: 44
          Bear (Tu-95) recon or cruise missile bomber: 168, 109, 115, 120,125
          Bombing runs: see air-to-ground combat, level bombing, dive
               bombing, toss bombing.
          Bombsight, symbology on HUD: 36-37
          Bombsight, use of: 58-59
          Brakes: 40
          Briefing, missions: 101-105
          Briefing, regions: 106-126
          Briefing, postflight: 64-66
          Briefing, preflight: 25-30
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     (C)  Cam (tracking camera) views: 43, 56
          Camera, 135 mm / IR reconnaissance, use of: 60, 81, 103
          Camera, 135 mm / IR reconnaissance, data: 146
          Camera, tracking: see tracking camera
          Cannon, data: 129-131, 135, 136, 140
          Cannon, how to fire: 44, 57, 78, 90-91
          Carrier: see Aircraft Carrier
          CBU-72 FAE laser-guided bomb, data: 129-131, 142
          Central Europe, detailed briefing: 122-126
          Central Europe, selection of: 26, 11-12, 7
          Chaff: 46-47, 62, 83, 88
          Chase plane view: 31
          Chasing the gauges: 50
          Coaler (An-72) air transport: 169, 109, 115, 120, 126
          Cockpit, view selection: 31, 40
          Cold war: 26, 64, 99
          Conflict level: 26, 64, 99-100
          Congressional medal of honor (CMOH): 64, 97
          Contents, table of: 3
                                                                     - 185 -
          Control stick: 39, 50, see also Technical Supplement
          Conventional war: 26, 64, 100
          Copyright notice: 182  <<< REMOVED >>>
          Crashes: 28, 51, 64
          Credits: 181
          CRTs, explained: 38-39, see also Technical Supplement
          Czechoslovakia: see Central Europe
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     (D)  Damage: 47-48
          Data charts, weaponry/ordnance: 129-134
          Debriefing, after the flight: 64-66
          Decorations: 65, 23, 67, 97, 127
          Decoys: 47, 62, 83, 86
          Defending against attack: 62-63, 83-84, 86-87, 93, 96
          Designate a new target: 44
          Designer's notes: 174-180
          Detail adjust: 33, see also Technical Supplement
          Distinguished Flying Cross (DFC): 23, 65
          Dive bombing: 80
          Dogfighting: 93-96
          Doppler search radar: 61, 75
          Duty Roster: 25
          Durandal anti-runway retarded bomb, data: 129-131, 143
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     (E)  E-3C "Sentry" AWACS plane (AEW&C): 163
          Eagle (F-15C) fighter: 159-160
          Early turn maneuver: 92
          Easy landings: 28, 51
          ECM (electronic counter-measures): 46, 83
          EF-111A "Raven" electronic warfare bomber: 162
          Eject: 43, 64
          Elite opponents: 28
          EMV (electro-magnetic visibility) scale: 45
          EMV, use of: 61, 76, 83, 85-86
          Enemy attacks, defence against: 62-63, 83-84, 86-87, 93, 96
          Europe: see Central Europe
          Extra Fuel: 42, 146
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     (F)  F-4E "Phantom II" fighter: 158, 114-115
          F-5E "Tiger II" fighter: 158-159, 114-115
          F-14D "Tomcat" fighter: 159, 114-115
          F-15C "Eagle" fighter: 159-160
          F-16C "Falcon" fighter: 160
          F-19 "Frisbee" stealth fighter, infrared signature: 85
          F-19 "Frisbee" stealth fighter, radar signature: 74-75
          F-19 "Frisbee" stealth fighter, technical data: 4
          F/A-18A "Hornet" fighter: 160
          FAE fuel-air explosive (CBU-72) laser-guided bomb, data: 129-131,
               142
          Falcon (F-16C) fighter: 160
          Fencer (Su-24) bomber: 166
                                                                     - 186 -
          FIM-43A "Redeye" IR-guided SAM, data: 133-134, 153
          FIM-92A "Stinger" IR-guided SAM, data: 133-134, 154
          Fire-and-forget: 77-78, 89-90, 93
          Fireye (Mk 122) free-fall bomb, data: 129-131, 145
          Fishbed (MiG-21) fighter: 164, 108-109
          Flanker (Su-27) fighter: 167, 120, 125
          Flaps: 49
          Flare: 47, 62, 86
          Flight performance options: 28, 51
          Flogger (MiG-23) fighter: 164, 108-109, 125
          Flying techniques: 50
          Forger (Yak-38) fighter-bomber: 167, 120, 121
          Foxbat (MiG-25) interceptor: 165, 108-109, 120
          Foxhound (MiG-31) interceptor: 166, 120, 125
          Free-fall bombs, use of: 59-60, 79-80
          Fuel: 42, 146
          Fulcrum (MiG-29) fighter: 165-166, 108-109, 120, 125
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     (G)  Gadfly (SA-11) radar-guided SAM, data: 133-134, 150
          Gainful (SA-6) radar-guided SAM, data: 133-134, 149-150
          Gammon (SA-5) radar-guided SAM, data: 133-134, 148
          Garnef (SA-4) radar-guided SAM, data: 133-134, 149
          Gaskin (SA-9B) IR-guided SAM, data: 133-134, 154
          GBU-12 paveway laser-guided bomb, data: 129-131, 142
          Gear and "GEAR" light: 40, 48
          Gecko (SA-8) radar-guided SAM, data: 133-134, 150
          Germany: see Central Europe
          Gladiator (SA-12) radar-guided SAM, data: 133-134, 149
          Glossary: 171-173
          Gopher (SA-13) IR-guided SAM, data: 133-134, 154
          Grail (SA-7B) IR-guided SAM, data: 133-134, 153
          Green opponents: 27
          Grumble (SA-10) radar-guided SAM, data: 133-134, 148-149
          Guided missiles: see air-to-air or air-to-ground missiles
          Guideline (SA-2) radar-guided SAM, data: 133-134, 148
          Gun: see cannon
          Gunsight, use of: 57, 78, 90-91
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     (H)  HARM (AGM-88A) anti-radar missile, data: 129-131, 141
          Harpoon (AGM-84A) air-to-ship missile, data: 129-131, 140
          Harrierr II (AV-8B) fighter: 161
          HAWK (MIM-23B) radar-guided SAM, data: 133-134, 150-151
          Hitting the target: 57, 42
          Hornet (F/A-18A) fighter: 160
          HUD, advice on use of: 50
          HUD AIR-AIR mode: 36-37, 34-35
          HUD AIR-GROUND mode: 37-38, 34-35
          HUD display, explained: 34-36
                                                                     - 187 -
          HUD modes: 34
          HUD NAV mode: 34-36
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     (I)  Identification quiz, aircraft: 25
          Il-76 "Mainstay" AEW&C plane: 169, 102, 109, 120, 125
          ILS (instrument landing system): 52-54, 42, 18-19
          Immelmann turn: 94
          INS (inertial navigation system): 41
          Installing simulation for your computer: see also Technical Supplement
          Intelligence briefing: 29
          Intruder (A-6E) bomber: 161
          Inverse Tactical ("Invrs Tacti") view: 32
          IR (infrared), generations: 85
          IR (infrared) guided surface-to-air missiles (SAMs): 62-63, 84-85,
               133-134, 147-152
          IR (infrared) jammer and "IRJ" light: 45-46, 62, 86, 93
          Iran: see Persian Gulf
          Iraq: see Persian Gulf
          ISC B-1 minelets, retarded bomb dispenser: 129-131, 144
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     (L)  Landing, on an aircraft carrier: 54-55, 71-73
          Landing, gear and "GEAR" light: 40, 48
          Landing, importance of: 64
          Landing, military: 71-73
          Landing, options: 28
          Landing, secret airstrips: 103
          Landing, straight-in: 54-55
          Launching, from an aircraft carrier: 49
          Laser-guided bombs: 58, 79, 142-143
          Level bombing: 59, 79
          Level flight: 50, 69-70
          Level of conflict: 26, 64, 99-100
          Libya, detailed briefing: 106-109
          Libya,  selection of: 26, 11-12, 7
          Lift: 69-70
          Limited war: 26, 64, 100
          Limited warranty: 183   <<< REMOVED >>>
          Loading into your computer: see also Technical Supplement
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     (M)  M61Al 20 mm cannon, data: 129-131, 135, 136, 140
          M61Al 20 mm cannon, how to fire: 44, 57, 78, 90-91
          Mainstay (Il-76) AEW&C plane: 169, 102, 109, 120, 125
          Maneuvering: see outmaneuvering missiles or air-to-air combat
          Map coordinates (ONC): 100
          Maverick (AGM-65D) air-to-ground missile, data: 129-131, 141
          Medals: 65, 23, 67, 97, 127
          MiG-21 "Fishbed" fighter: 164, 108-109
          MiG-23 "Flogger" fighter: 164, 108-109, 125
          MiG-25 "Foxbat" interceptor: 165, 108-109, 120
          MiG-27 "Flogger" bomber: 165, 108-109
          MiG-29 "Fulcrum" fighter: 165-166, 108-109, 120, 125
                                                                     - 188 -
          MiG-31 "Foxhound" interceptor: 166, 120, 125
          Military Landing: 71-73
          Minelets (ISC B-1), retarded bomb dispenser: 129-131, 144
          Missile view: 32
          Missile warnings: 45-46, 84
          Mission, description of: 29, 101-105
          Mission, selection of: 27, 65
          Mission, summary of while in flight: 42
          Mission, Tactics: 101-105
          Mk 20 "Rockeye" retarded bomb, data: 129-131, 143
          Mk 20 "Rockeye II" laser-guided bomb, data: 129-131, 142-143
          Mk 35 incendiary cluster, retarded bomb, data: 129-131, 144
          Mk 82-0 "Slick" free-fall bomb, data: 129-131, 145
          Mk 82-1 "Snackeye" retarded bomb, data: 129-131, 144
          Mk 122 "Fireye" free-fall bomb, data: 129-131, 145
          Murmansk: see North Cape
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     (N)  No crashes: 28, 51, 64
          Normal time: 33
          North Cape, detailed briefing: 116-121
          North Cape, selection of: 26, 11-12, 7
          Norway: see North Cape
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     (O)  Officer's Club: 66
          ONC map coordinates: 100
          Opponent selection: 27
          Ordnance, effectiveness ratings: 131
          Ordnance data: 129-131, 135, 140-146
          Ordnance selection, at start of mission: 29, 101
          Ordnance selection, while in flight: 43-44
          Outmaneuvering missiles: 87, 83-84, 86
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     (P)  Parachute: see Eject
          Paradrop: see Airdrop
          Pause: 33, see also Technical Supplement
          PAVE TACK: 58, 79, 142-143
          Paveway (GBU-12) laser-guided bomb: 129-131, 142
          Penquin-3 air-to-ship missile, data: 129-131, 140
          Persian Gulf, detailed briefing: 110-115
          Persian Gulf, selection of: 26, 11-12, 7
          Phantom II (F-4E) fighter: 158, 114-115
          Photo recon: see camera, 135 mm/IR
          Pilot Roster: 25
          Poland: see Central Europe
          Promotions: 65-66
          Pulse search radar: 61, 75
          Purple Heart (PH): 65, 127
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     (Q)  Quickstart: 7
          Quit simulation: 33, see also Technical Supplement
                                                                     - 189 -
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     (R)  "R" warning light: 45-46, 84
          Radar-guided surface-to-air missiles (SAMs): 62-63, 81-82, 133-134,
               147-152
          Ranks: 66
          Rapier radar-guided SAM, data: 133-134, 151
          Raven (EF-111A) electronic warfare bomber: 162
          Realistic landings: 28, 51
          Reconnaissance photos: see camera, 135 mm/IR
          Redeye (FIM-43A) IR-guided SAM, data: 133-134, 153
          Region of the world selection: 26
          Regular opponents: 27
          Resupply: 33, see also Technical Supplement
          Retirement: 66
          Rockeye (Mk 20) retarded bomb, data: 129-131, 143
          Rockeye II (Mk 20) laser-guided bomb, data:  129-131, 142-143
          Roster: 25
          Rules of engagement (ROE) 99-100
          Russia: see North Cape, Central Europe,  and appropriate equipment
               entries
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     (S)  SA-2 "Guideline" radar-guided SAM, data: 133-134, 148
          SA-4 "Ganef" radar-guided SAM, data: 133-134, 149
          SA-5 "Gammon" radar-guided SAM, data: 133-134, 148
          SA-6 "Gainful" radar-guided SAM, data: 133-134, 149-150
          SA-7 "Grail" IR-guided SAM, data: 133-134, 153
          SA-8 "Gecko" radar-guided SAM, data: 133-134, 150
          SA-9 Gaskin IR-guided SAM, data: 133-134, 154
          SA-10 "Grumble" radar-guided SAM, data: 133-134, 148-149
          SA-11 "Gadfly" radar-guided SAM, data: 133-134, 150
          SA-12 "Gladiator" radar-guided SAM, data: 133-134, 149
          SA-13 Gopher IR-guided SAM, data: 133-134, 154
          SA-14 IR-guided SAM, data: 133-134, 153-154
          SA-16 IR-guided SAM, data: 133-134, 153-154
          SA-N-4 radar-guided naval SAM, data: 133-134, 151, 120, 126
          SA-N-5 IR-guided naval SAM, data: 133-134, 155, 108-109, 120, 126
          SA-N-6 radar-guided naval SAM, data: 133-134, 152, 120
          SA-N-7 radar-guided naval SAM, data: 133-134, 152, 120, 126
          SAM: see surface-to-air missiles
          Satelite/radar map on CRT: 38, see also Technical Supplement
          Saudi Arabia: see Persian Gulf
          Save simulation: 33, 36, see also Technical Supplement, see also
               Installation in Technical Supplement
          Scissors turn: 94
          Seacat visually-guided SAM, data: 133-134, 155
          Search (radar) warning: 45, 84
          Sentry (E-3C) AWACS plane (AEW&C): 163
          Ships, tactics against: 104, 131
          Shoulder-launched surface-to-air missiles (SAM): 84-85, 133-134,
               153-154
          Side view: 31
          Sidewinder (AIM-9H), data: 132, 136, 115
          Sidewinder (AIM-9M), data: 129-131, 135
                                                                     - 190 -
          Silver Star: 65, 67
          Slick (Mk 82-0) free-fall bomb, data: 129-131, 145
          Slot view: 3
          Snakeye (Mk 82-1) retarded bomb, data: 129-131, 144
          Sparrow (AIM-7E) radar-guided missile, data: 115, 132, 138
          Special equipment: 60, 103, 146
          Split-S turn: 95
          Stalls: 71
          Stealth design and technology: 74-75
          Stealth flying: 61, 76-77
          Stinger (FIM-92A) IR-guided SAM, data: 133-134, 154
          Straight-in landing: 54-55
          Strike missions described: 103-105
          Su-24 "Fencer" bomber: 166
          Su-27 "Flanker" fighter: 167, 120, 125
          Submarine pens: 104, 119, 131
          Surface-to-air missiles, data: 133-134, 147-156
          Surface-to-air missiles, principles: 81-82, 84-85
          Surface-to-air missiles, tactics against: 62-63, 83-87, 104, 131
          Sweden: see North Cape
          Systems damage: 47-48
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     (T)  Tactical ("Tacti") view: 31
          Tactical display on CRT: 38-39, see also Technical Supplement
          Takeoff: 49-50
          Target, box on HUD: 36-37
          Target, designation of new: 44
          Target, locating and selecting: 56, 44
          Target, hit and miss: 42, 57
          Threading the needle: 76-77
          Throttle: 39-40
          Thunderbolt II (A-10A) bomber: 162
          Tigercat visually-guided SAM, data: 133-134, 155
          Tiger II (F-5E) fighter: 158-159, 114-115
          Tomcat (F-14D) fighter: 159, 114-115
          Toss bombing: 58
          TRAK warning light: 45, 84
          Tracking box/oval on HUD: 43-44
          Tracking camera: 43, 56
          Training mission selection: 27, 65
          Training option in-flight: see also Technical Supplement
          Tu-26 "Backfire" bomber: 168
          Tu-95 "Bear" recon or cruise missile bomber: 168, 109, 115, 120,
               125
          Turning: 50-51, 70
          Turning inside, dogfighting maneuver: 93-94
          Turning inside, missile defense maneuver: 86, 87
          Tutorial, complete: 11-122
          Tutorial, quickstart: 7-9
                                                                     - 191 -
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     (V)  Veteran opponents: 28
          View, from the cockpit: 40-41
          View, from tracking camera: 43
          View, of cockpit and HUD: 31, 40
          View, out-of-plane: 31-32
          Volume adjust: 33, see also Technical Supplement
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     (W)  War, cold, limited or conventional: 26, 64, 99-100
          Warranty: see Limited warranty
          Waypoints: 41
          Weaponry: see Ordnance
          Weapons bay doors: 44
          Wide-angle view: 32
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     (Y)  Yak-38 "Forger" fighter-bomber: 167, 120, 121
          Yo-yo turn: 95
                                                                     - 192 -

     -*-*-*-*-*-*-*-*-*-*-*-*-*-*-*-*-*-*-*-*-*-*-*-*-*-*-*-*-*-*-*-*-*-*-*-*

                              F-19 STEALTH FIGHTER

                             Technical Supplement:
                             ---------------------

                           Atari ST & Commodore Amiga

     F-19 STEALTH FIGHTER. GETTING STARTED.
     --------------------------------------

     Required Equipment:

        Please note that this simulation requires a minimum of 512 K of RAM. A
     colour monitor or television is required for the ST version.
        This simulation can be run entirely from the keyboard, with mouse and
     keyboard, or with joystick and keyboard. A joystick greatly improves the
     "feel" and realism, and is therefore strongly recommended.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Installation:

        The F-19 Stealth Fighter manual asks you to install the simulation
     onto back-up Floppy Disks. This is only necessary for IBM PC compatible
     versions. You do not need to install Atari ST or Commodore Amiga
     versions.
        Your pilot records will be automatically saved to disk A, provided
     that it is write-enable proir to loading.

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Atari ST:

        Turn off your computer and remove all unnecessary peripherals. Insert
     A into the internal drive and switch on the computer. The program will
     auto-load. Please follow any on-screen prompts. (if you have an
     additional extra drive, disk B may be inserted into this drive, and will
     be automatically accessed by the computer when necessary).

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Commodore Amiga:

        Turn off your computer and remove all unnecessary peripherals. Insert
     disk A into the internal drive and switch on the computer. The program
     will auto-load. Please follow any on-screen prompts.

     WHAT IF MY GAME FAILS TO LOAD ?
     -------------------------------

        In the vast majority of cases a loading problem is not because of
     faulty software, but either an incorrect loading proceedure or a
     hardware fault.
        Please ensure that the loading instructions have been correctly
     executed. The commonest hardware failures are due to a misalignment of
     the heads in the disk drive. Such faults may be detected by loading the
     game on another computer.(Either use a friend's machine or ask the
     software store from which the game was purchased to test it).
        Alternatively, a virus may have transfered into your hardware from
     another piece of software. Pirated copies of games are an incredibly
     common source of viruses. It always pays to own original software.
        In the unlikely event of a software fault., please return the
     complete package, with receipt to the place of purchase. MicroProse
     regret that goods cannot be replaced unless bought from the company
     directly.
        If you have any difficulty whilst loading F-19, or need help whilst
     running the simulation, MicroProse will be happy to help you on the
     Helpline. Please ring (0666) 504399.

     FACT OR FICTION ?: THE DEVELOPMENT OF "F-19 STEALTH FIGHTER"
     ------------------------------------------------------------

     NEWSFLASH:

     From the department of Defense, Office of the Assistant Secretary
     (Public Affairs)

        November 10, 1988 (Washington D.C.): Today the U.S. Air Force
     announced the existence of an operational stealth fighter aircraft. This
     single seat, dual-engine jet was constructed by the Lockhead Corporation,
     built with bipartisan congressional support, it has been perational
     since 1983 with the 4450th Tactical Group, based on the Tonopah Airfield
     at Nellis Air Force Base, Nevada.
        Technical specifications, possible missions, and operations have not
     been disclosed. However, design features and the use of A-7 trainers
     suggest that the plane is intended for clandestine reconnaissance, ground
     attack, and air-to-air ambushes. In short, the US Air Force's actual
     stealth fighter is amazingly similar to MicroProse's "F-19 Stealth
     Fighter" simulation, published for IMB PC compatible machines twelve
     months prior to the actual plane's disclosure. It is known that the Air
     Force uses the designation "F-117A" instead of "F-19".

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Stealth Fighter:

     1978:          Lockheed receives the program "go ahead" from the U.S
                    Department of Defense
     1981:          Lockheed test-flies the new Stealth Fighter.
     1983:          The U.S. Air Force accepts delivery of the first fighters
                    and the 4450th TG becomes an operational unit.
     1986:          A fatal Stealth Fighter crash in Bakersfield, California
                    is hushed up by the Air Force before the news media
                    discovers what happened.
     1987:          MicroProse first publishes a Stealth Fighter computer
                    simulation for IBM PC compatible machines.
     1988:          The U.S. Air Force admits that Stealth Fighters have been
                    operational for the last five years.
     1989:          MicroProse begin work in the UK an "F-19 Stealth Fighter"
                    for Atari ST and Commodore Amiga machines. The decision
                    is taken to reatin the original characteristics of
                    MicroProse's "F-19 Stealth Fighter", as a testament on
                    the accuracy of MicroProse's research, and to enhance the
                    simulation by including an option to see the actual
                    F-117A plane in external 3-D views.
     1990:          Atari St and Commodore Amiga versions are released.

     ADDITIONAL FEATURES for ATARI ST and COMMODORE AMIGA VERSIONS
     -------------------------------------------------------------
     Pre-Flight Options
     ------------------
     
        Method of Control:
        ------------------
        Once the game has loaded, you will be asked to select your method of
     control, by pressing one of the numeric keys on the keyboard, as
     follows;

               1. Mouse
               2. Joystick
               3. Keyboard

        The Pilot Roster:
        -----------------
        The original pilot roster will be automatically updated after each
     mission, provided that you have write-enabled your disk A. You do not
     have to "install" the simulation onto back-up Floppy Disks.

        Intelligence Briefing:
        ----------------------
        Move the Controller up and down the list of options to highlight one,
     and press the Selector to toggle that option on and off.
        To receive specific data on an item displayed on the map, move the
     Controller over that item on the map.

        External Aircraft Views:
        ------------------------
        As explained on the previous page, MicroProse's Software Engineers
     have added the option to view your plane in Slot View, Chase Plane,
     Side View, Tacti View or Inverse Tacti View, as either the F-19 or
     F-117A.
        Your choice of plane is made immediately after the Mission Briefing,
     and before choosing the armaments for your mission.

        In-Flight:
        ----------
        The star system has been accurately mapped and is visible during
     night missions. It appears on screen as it would according to your
     actual position and heading. It is therefore possible to navigate by
     the stars!

                                   CONTROLS:
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Preflight & PostFlight Options:

     Controller     joystick, or arrow keys, or mouse
     Selection      joystick button, or return key, or left mouse button

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Control Stick:

     Pitch Down     stick forward, or up-arrow, or mouse forward
     Roll right     stick right, or right-arrow, or mouse right
     Roll left      stick left, or left-arrow, or mouse left
     Pitch Up       stick back, or down-arrow, or mouse back
     Down & right   stick forward & right, or up & right, or forward & right
     Down & left    stick forward & left, or up & left, or forward & left
     Up & right     stick back & right, or down & right, or back & right
     Up & left      stick back & left, or down & left, or back & left

     Adjust stick sensitivity      'Ins' key
        (tiny, small and medium stick movement)

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Throttle:

     Max Pwr (maximum power)       Shift and '+/=' key
     Incr (increase throttle)      '=' key
     Decr (decrease throttle)      '-' key
     No Pwr (no power)             Shift and '-/_' key

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Other Flight Controls:

     Gear (landing gear toggle)         '6' key (on main keyboard)
     Flaps (extend / retract toggle)    '9' key (on main keyboard)
     Brakes (on / off toggle)           '0' key (on main keyboard)
     Autopilot (on / off toggle)        '7' key (on main keyboard)
     Accel (accelerated) time           Shift and 'Z' key
     Norm (normal) time                 Shift and 'X' key

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Out-of-Plane Viewing:

     Slot View                     Shift and 'F1' key
     Chase Plane                   Shift and 'F2' key
     Side View                     Shift and 'F3' key
     Missile View                  Shift and 'F4' key
     Tacti view (you & enemy)      Shift and 'F6' key
     Invrs tacti (enemy & you)     Shift and 'F7' key

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Out-of-Cockpit Viewing:

     View ahead          Shift and '?/' key
     View rear           Shift and '>.' key
     View left           Shift and '<,' key
     View right          Shift and 'M' key

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Other View Keys:

     Zoom (view or map)                 'z' key
     Unzoom (view or map)               'x' key
     View Angle (narrow or wide)        'c' key

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Cockpit Controls:

     Cockpit View                        'F1' key
     HUD Modes                           'F2' key
     CRT Maps (toggles left-side CRT)    'F3' key
     Data (on right-side CRT)            'F4' key
     Ordnance (on right-side CRT)        'F5' key
     System Damage (on right-side CRT)   'F6' key
     ILS (on/off the HUD)                'F9' key
     Mission (on right-side CRT)         'F10' key
     Eject (bail out)                    Shift and 'F10' key

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     INS (inertial Navigation System):

     Select Waypoint (on right-side CRT)  'F7' key
     Change Waypoint (on both CRTs)       'F8' key
     Reset Waypoint (all)                 Shift and 'F8' key
     Select/Change Previous Waypoint      Minus (-) key on numeric keypad
     Select/Change Next Waypoint          Plus (+) key on numeric keypad
     Move Waypoint Up (changing pt)       Up-arrow (numeric keypad '8') key
     Move Waypoint Down (changing pt)     Down-arrow (numeric keypad '2') key
     Move Waypoint Left (changing pt)     Left-arrow (numeric keypad '4') key
     Move Waypoint Right (changing pt)    Right-arrow (numeric keypad '6') key

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Tracking Camera (appears on right-side cockpit CRT):

     Cam Ahead                               '/' key
     Cam Rear                                '.' key
     Cam Left                                'm' key
     Cam Right                               ',' key
     Select Target (in current view arc)     'b' key
     Designate New Target (ahead only)       'n' key

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Armaments:

     Ordnance (on right-side CRT)     'F5' key
     Select Ordnance                  space bar
     Bay Doors (toggles open/closed)  '8' key (on main keyboard)
     Fire Ordnance                    or return key, or right mouse button
     Fire Cannon      joystick button, or backspace key, or left mouse button

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Defences:

     Flare (drop one cartridge)    '1' key (on main keyboard)
     Chaff (drop one cartridge)    '2' key (on main keyboard)
     IR Jammer (toggles on/off)    '3' key (on main keyboard)
     ECM (radar jammer on/off)     '4' key (on main keyboard)
     Decoy (drop one)              '5' key (on main keyboard)


                              Simulation Controls:
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------

     Pause (press any key to un-pause)  Alt and 'p' key
     "Boss" (hides simulation)          Alt and 'b' key
     Quit                               Alt and 'q' key
     Resupply (training only)           Alt and 'r' key
     Change missions to training        Alt and 't' key

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------

     Keyboard Control Stick Adjust           'Ins' key
     keybd sensitivity 3 = keypress causes large stick movement
     keybd sensitivity 2 = keypress causes moderate stick movement (default)
     keybd sensitivity 1 = keypress causes small stick movement

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------

     Volume Adjust (4 sound levels)          Alt and 'v' key
     Sound level 3 = all sounds
     Sound level 2 = all sounds except engine background noise (default)
     Sound level 1 = firing and explosions only (no warning sounds)
     Sound level 0 = no sound

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------

     Detail Adjust (2 levels)                Alt and 'd' key
     detail level 1 = maximum detail on Tactical and Track Cam displays
     detail level 0 = normal detail on Tactical and Track Cam displays

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------

     Slew Controls (4 directions)
     slew north (training only)         Alt and 'i' key
     slew west (training only)          Alt and 'j' key
     slew south (training only)         Alt and 'k' key
     slew east (training only)          Alt and 'l' key

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Notes on Simulation Controls:
     -----------------------------

        Change Mission to Training (Alt and 't' key) tapping this key
     converts your current mission into a training mission. This means that
     henceforth enemy weapons do no damage. Tapping Alt 't' again exits
     training.
        Once a mission is converted to training you cannot score any points
     for it, even if you toggle training off again. However, the slew
     controls and resupply key only function when training is active.
        Keyboard Control Stick Adjust ('Ins' key) This regulates the amount
     of control stick movement a keypress causes. We recommend you use this
     key frequently when flying, and always set the sensitivity to "1" on
     your final approach to landing.
        Detail Adjust (Alt and 'd' key) The detail displayed on the Tactical
     and Track Cam displays may be altered from normal (detail level = 0) to
     maximum (detail level = 1). The tactical display shows all the 16 km
     grid lines at maximum detail, and the Track Cam update will appear to
     be smoother.
        Slew (Alt and 'i', 'j', 'k', 'l' keys) These keys function only in
     training. Tapping the key "teleports" your aircraft in that direction.
     The distance you're "teleported" varies with the current Zoom/Unzoom
     scale pf the satellite/radar map. Slew is an excellent way to check out
     the region whilst training.

                                Display Colours:
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     HUD Targeting Colours

     Black Rectangle          Ineffective Weapon (day)
     Brown Rectangle          Ineffective Weapon (night)
     White Rectangle          Effective Weapon
     White Hexagon            Effective Weapon, locked on target
     Red Hexagon              Highly effective weapon, locked on target

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     EMV Scale Colours

     Red line                 Enemy Ground radar, has not detected you
     Orange line              Enemy Ground radar, has poor detection
     Yellow line              Enemy Ground radar, which detected you
     Light blue line          Enemy Ground radar, has not detected you
     White line               Enemy Ground radar, which detected you

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Damage Tattletales

     Blue                     System functioning
     Red                      System failure (damaged or destroyed)

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Autopilot Light

     White                    Autopilot On
     Black                    Autopilot Off

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Landing Gear Light

     Black                    Landing Gear Up
     Flashing White           Landing Gear Down at too high speed
     White                    Landing Gear Down

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Other Warning Lights

     Bright Colour            On
     White                    Off

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Satellite/Radar Map

     Flashing White Dot       Your Aircraft
     Flashing yellow-red      Mission objective on ground
     Blinking Red             Mission objective in air
     Red Dot                  Other Aircraft
     Black Dot                Ground Radar
     Yellow Dot               Enemy Radar
     Dotted Line              Pulse Radar
     Solid Line               Doppler Radar
     White Dot                Takeoff and landing locations

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Tactical Display

     Grey squares             16km grid
     Yellow Radar Dish        Ground Radar
     Blue Boat                Warship Radar
     Grey Rectangle           Airfield
     Red Crossed Circle       Other Ground Targets
     Grey airplane            Your F-19
     Grey outline             Decoy
     White Dots               Chaff
     Red & Yellow burst       Flare
     Blue Plane               Plane at higher altitude
     Light Red Plane          plane at similar altitude
     Yellow Plane             plane at lower altitude
     Yellow Line              Radar-guided missile
     Red Line                 IR-guided missile
     Yellow Line              Visually guided missile
     White Line               Missile fired from F-19
     White-boxed object       Current target (in your tracking system)
     Colour-boxed object      Source of enemy radar signal

     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
     INS Waypoints Fuel Bar

     Black region             Fuel consumed
     White Region             Fuel for flight to current waypoint
     Blue Regions             Fuel for flight to other waypoints
     Yellow Region            Reserve Fuel


                                Tips to Pilots:
     ------------------------------------------------------------------------
        When flying a mission don't except the enemy to act randomly or
     stupidly. They have a surprising amount of intelligence. Fighters and
     AWACS planes patrol to cover radar weak spots, or protect especially
     important areas.
        If you're spotted, interceptors are scrambled and vectored to your
     last known location. If they lose sight of your F-19, they investigate
     your last known position, but will eventually give up and go home. In
     addition, enemy aircraft and radar operators become more aggressive,
     sometimes even frantic, after they have repeated sightings, or have
     suffered a few losses.
        The best way to get all the trouble you can handle is to engage
     "regular" or better enemies, and to loiter about the scene of a battle.
     Conversely, the best way to avoid troubles is to disappear from sight as
     quickly as possible. In general, trying to take on the entire enemy
     defense system with one F-19 is very unwise!

     ************************************************************************
                                    MEDALS:
     ************************************************************************

     Airman's Medal:
     This medal is commonly awarded for heroism that involves the voluntary
     risk of life under conditions other than those of conflict with an
     opposing armed force.

     Distinguished Flying Cross:
     This medal is awarded for heroism or extraordinary achievement while
     participating in aerial flight, including valorious performance in
     combat.

     The Silver Star:
     This medal is awarded for gallantry in action against opposing armed
     forces. The large gold star design has a tiny silver star in the center,
     surrounded by a laurel-wreath design.

     The Air Force Cross:
     This medal is awarded for extraordinary heroism in connection with
     military operations against an opposing armed force. It is the second
     highest combat decoration available to US Air Force pilots.

     The Congressional Medal of Honor is America's highest military
     decoration. According to the United States Department of Defense, it is
     warded for "conspicuous gallantry and intrepidity of the risk of life,
     above and beyond the call of duty, in action involving actual conflict
     with an opposing armed force".

     The Purple Heart:
     This medal is awarded to servicemen who are injured or killed as a result
     of an act by an opposing armed force. Typically the injury must be
     serious enough to require attention at a base hospital, often with
     reduced duties or discharge afterward.

     ************************************************************************
                             CALL DUAL CREW'S WHQ:
     ************************************************************************
                        _______ __ _______    __   ____
                       / ______\\ \\_____ \ __\ \ / ___|
                      / /___  _  \ \  ___\ \\ \\ \\ \____
                     / //_  || |  \ \|  _  // / \ \\____ \
                     \ \__| || |__/ /| | \ \\ \_/ /____/ /
                      \_____||_____/ |_|  \_\\___//_____/
                    ___ ________     ______ ___   ______
         ______    |__ \\______ \   / ____// _ \ / _  _ \       ______
         \_____\      \ \   ___\ \ / /___ / / \ \\ \\ \\ \     /_____/
            \___|      \ \ |  _  // ____// /   \ \\ \\ \\ \   |___/
              \_|  _____\ \| | \ \\ \____\ \____\ \\ \\ \\ \  |_/
                  |_______/|_|  \_\\_____\\_____\\_\\//_//_/

                  14.400 bps      24h/day    * 323 mb ONLINE *

                         Sysop : Snuskbuske / Dual Crew
                          CoSysop: Stookie / Dual Crew

                       ___       ___       ___  ___  ___      ___  ___
           __/_  /__/ /__  ___  /__/ ___    _/ /__    _/ /__/ __/ /__
            /      / /__/      /__/      ___/ /__/ ___/    / /__ ___/

     ************************************************************************

     AND REMEMBER:

          A PROGRAM WORTH USING IS WORTH BUYING !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
          ======================================================

